Then my husband and I went to San Diego for our 20th anniversary, December 2008. We were eating at an outdoor cafe (you can do that in San Diego in December), and I was enjoying watching the variety of people walk by. It got me thinking about them and wondering what it would be like to actually "be" the 20-something girl in hip clothes laughing with her friends or the harried business man pushing through the crowds. I wanted to get inside their heads, feel what it was like to live in their skins for a day.
17:00 Close
I came to know about Padmini akka as I call her, through her mother. It is now almost three years since I have a beautiful bonding with her and her Energy Healing has made tremendous quality changes in my daily life.
However, I still feel a lot of resistance even as I’m writing this. A voice in my head tells me to not do this. To not finish it. To not publish it. But, I will publish. Have I done this much writing I will not throw it out, I will publish it no matter what I think. So, this is why this update is the way it is. No secrets, no lies. Only words.
The affirmation and celebration of extreme individualism, instant self-gratification, and alienation from one another and nature characteristic of the contemporary Western worldview resonates with the primitive core of the human brain, commonly known as the reptilian brain. This is the site of our most basic, individualistic, and predatory hide, fight, or flight survival instincts unmediated by the more highly evolved mammalian brain that is the source of our human capacity for compassion and bonding and the neocortical brain where our distinctive human capacity for self-awareness and reason resides.
It pulls at the heart strings though, to know your child's being teased. I've just spent the last hour searching for large balls of cotton wool to wrap her up in. Unfortunately, Amazon are out of stock.
In such a case, if the SPL blocked newco for next season, then in the view of many, I am sure, Neil Doncaster’s organisation would be up there in the rogues’ gallery along with the SFA as being responsible for the “death” of Rangers.
Republican Senators, in particular Tom Libous of Binghamton, the Deputy Majority Leader, were also concerned that there would be "parity" in road funding between upstate and downstate, and last week State leaders produced a "memorandum of understanding" that would send "$751 million to the upstate regions north and west of the Hudson Valley. ... the Hudson Valley, including Westchester, Rockland, Putnam, Ulster and Dutchess counties, would get up to $158 million, Long Island would get up to $291 million, and New York City would get up to $415 million."
Fight for EVERYONE in every circumstance. If we have the love of God it should come as no extra work or issue in our lives.
Moody: “In a shocking story that reverberated around the world, the cellphone video that had gone viral in Soweto came into the hands of the Daily Sun last month, who then contacted the police. Sun reporters went with the police into the streets with pictures of the alleged rapists (taken from the video) to try find them and the girl, who had been missing for about three weeks. This resulted in arrests (of seven boys and men between the ages of 14 to 20) and then, weighing up the girl's dignity against her safety, the paper published her picture in a plea to the public to help find her.
Many thanks to everyone who joined in last week and we thoroughly enjoyed looking at all your entries and boy, oh boy, did Karen have a hard job choosing. The top 3 in no paticular order are :
On this basis, Dawkins suggested, it was wrong to claim Britain is still a Christian country, so we should get rid of bishops sitting in the House of Lords, abolish faith schools and put an end to chaplains in NHS hospitals.
girl is heat embossed in a clear gloss.
The place hadn’t yet been organized. A pair of beds sat in one corner, surrounded by assorted pieces of furniture. The building’s interior was dry, crisp, and brightly lit. It might have appeared sterile, if not for the spray paint on much of the sheet metal, and the tracks of dried mud on the ground near the door.
For he has set a day when he will judge the world with justice by the man he has appointed. He has given proof of this to all men by raising him from the dead.
Mark was 15 when his parents gave him a shiny new laptop for Christmas. They were so excited to give it to him because they knew how much he loved to play games on the computer. It was a joyful moment as he tore open the wrapping and his eyes lit up. He was surprised and delighted and gratitude poured out from his mouth. It was his own. Or so he thought. Fast forward only one month. His grades arrive in the mail. He's not doing so well in math. He hates math. He tries really hard, but doesn't understand the material, or his teacher. He has given up on ever doing well. So he's fine with getting a C, but his parents are not fine with it. They come into his room holding the report card, angry and disappointed apparently because he has not invented the kind of magic it would take for him to suddenly start excelling in math. "We're taking away your laptop until you start getting a B or better," they say. They are hoping it will motivate him to try harder. They don't understand that it's not about trying harder. He's doing his best. "But you said it was mine. You gave it to me. Please don't take it away," Mark begs. "We gave it to you, and we can take it away," his parents bluntly explain.
Now, if none of you have ever tried this. I suggest not even attempting it. This is why I did 5 trial runs.
holding just enough
Friday 23rd December - I really love this outfit, because I can fit into the top and the skirt again!! There is still a bit of a tummy roll, but losing a couple of kilos has made a huge difference. Ignore my hair - it was still mostly wet from the shower and that's why it's totally flat around my head.
And once you find yourself content,
I made mine just using magazine pages. I found some cute floral backgrounds on the fashion pages and just mixed them up. I used plain glue to stick them to the frame, but I'd recommend a layer of Mod Podge over the top as well, if you ever attempt a collage frame. Then I stuck this feather on the corner with some hot glue. I'm really happy with it.
DEAR READER
Jan 4
To me, it felt nothing but an attempt to emotionally manipulate its viewers.
For tonight's bout, we're using a Ten Point Must System. I want a fair and clean fight. No hitting below the belt, and always break on my command. Now click pint glasses.
and/or a bit of ROTEL or regular DICED TOMATOES for more tomato taste
What do these two very different takes have to teach us about hate and about the haters? I’ve written on this subject before but here there seemed a much more complex relationship between L’etranger‘s main protagonist, Mersault and the Kanye-narrator ‘character’ in ‘Power’. Hate, rather than simply a by-product of difference or success, seemed intimately entwined with how to live one’s life, a reflection of a sophisticated relationship with oneself and one’s society.
Catalog#: HLL 101-25
HOW INCREDIBLE WAS BARAKA OBAMA'S SPEECH TONIGHT???? can we talk about being gracious in victory? he raised the bar with his speech and set the democratic tone for the presidential campaign. i haven't felt this hopeful for my country in a long time. we, the people, have spoken and it's on to november 4th and the election of a democratic president of the united states of america!
Doors open at 5pm. Bands start at 9pm. The Magpie, Brute Force, Les Sans Cullotes.
(Oh, and that wall? I was coming down with a cold. Maybe my plan isn’t to blame!)
4. Even when you aren’t with one another, you are tied at the hip.
One of the things we worked on was a process flow ... what steps were needed to create plied yarn? Today was graduation day -- my now-former student is happy with her skill level and her yarn. Here is how she goes about it ...
It is quite hot here now so the air-conditioner has really helped. We worked slowly for most of the day, but in the afternoon we usually went to the pool for an hour or so to cool off and discuss the sailing situation in the Red Sea with other cruisers. Several boats from the Indonesia Rally have changed plans and will be heading to South Africa instead, either this year or next.
"Oh, the Sadness!" said the woman, as pleased as if she had seen an old friend.
Remember those half filled cupcake holders of cake batter-they made the perfect topping for what I already had put together. I set one on top of each cake and sprinkled everything with cocoa powder. Yes I know Chef Payard's recipes have more than enough steps in them, why add to it? Because I wanted individual servings that I could take to work ! And they loved them at work. It was my little goodbye gift to my friends.
The Bulletin also stated that
Here is an update on the linen clutch. I am 3 inches from finishing the front. I switched back to the old bernat aluminum straight needles and finally seem to have found some kind of rhythm . It is still not speedy knitting . The tip of my left finger is kind of sore from struggling with this double strand ,knit two together in back of stitch pattern, but I soon will be done with the herringbone stitch and on with good old stockinette stitch. The herringbone pattern that this stitch forms is nice so it is probably worth the trouble.
Happy Stamping! Hope your day rocked!
Jackson and I stopped off at home after his hockey game to quickly change clothes before going to Austin's baseball game. We were the only ones in the house at the time. Or so we thought. While Jax went to his room to take off his hockey gear, I went to the bathroom to change into jeans so the mosquitoes wouldn't eat my ankles at the game. So, I'm pulling my jeans on when out of nowhere, BAM! The moth flies by! I was very calm, cool, and collected as I screamed and tried to run away. But you can't really run when your pants are around your knees. I fell in a heap on the floor like a huge, half-dressed dork who's afraid of a batmoth. Because, pretty much, I am a huge dork who's afraid of any flying creature.
Found this funny but please don't let the MSM know, you know how they are suckers for an anti smoking story.
The life of a production employee...what a life...
But they found out last month that they didn’t win, and since then have been unable to find out how the contest was decided. They, and one contest winner, think the film’s topic cut too close to a controversy over the record number of immigrants deported by the Obama administration.
And you’re crumbling on your own
Right down the dam gross-bellied frogs were cocked
In large bowl combine veggies and fruit of your choice with lemon or lime juice, vinegar, and olive oil. Season with salt and pepper, as desired. Toss in the cooled quinoa, nuts, cilantro, taste and adjust seasonings, if needed. Serve chilled, and garnish with more herbs, if desired.
In a heavy bottom pan, pour the oil, once the oil is hot and steaming, turn the heat to low and add the whole garam sasalas, immediately after that add the onion and the sugar. Let the onion fry for about 7 to 8 mins, add the spices. The amount of oil is not sufficient for the spices to fry (I initially used to put around 8 table spoons of oil, but that makes the dish too rich since the lamb releases a whole lot of fat during cooking, so I reduced the amount of oil), so you will have been add drops of water to help the masala cook, once the masala is done, add the ginger garlic paste, cook for 5 mins more, adding water otherwise the masala may burn. Add the meat, fat side down and press it down. The purpose is to sear the meat and seal in the flavours, turn it around and on the sides and sear the other sides too. Then add the yogurt and the tomatoes and let it all cook together. What our grandmothers and mothers do is let this meat cook for an hour without adding any water. This is the tedious stage, since there is not much oil, chances of the meat burning are big, so you have to keep adding drops of water to help it cook. Depending on my patience level I do this for twenty minutes to an hour. Once an hour is over or your patience is, add three to four cups of hot water and bring it to a boil.
As hard as it is for me, hopefully one day soon, I too will be able to turn away from what I love doing, and walk on.
The message of these stories needs to be heard and discussed by Christians and churches today. The Gospel should be taught and lived in such a way that it is good news for the broken, the poor and the disadvantaged. If our presentation or living out of the Gospel isn’t good news to those on the bottom of the pile and the end of the line, then perhaps we need to reevaluate.
Mustered Seeds - 1/4 teaspoon
I'm slowly coming to the realization that I don't have friends, I really just have 'people I work on projects with'. I hadn't really felt that way about the people around me, but it's become increasingly apparent that that's how everyone seems to feel about ME. I don't get invited to stuff--to dinners, movies, shows, parties even--although I'm thought of when someone needs a costume, I'm just not...remembered...when it comes to doing stuff socially, I guess. I had thought that I was sort of the lynch pin of all of us--the connecting person who introduced this person/family to that person/family--that when we got together to do something, we ALL got together to do something, but apparently that was a figment of my own self-importance. I resolve to try to connect to people on a social level, rather than just on a working-together level.
After Asami disappears, Aoyama searches for her and descends into the darkness of her background and his infatuation, the techniques used to display this range from the visual (skewed camera angles, obvious editing, changes in colour saturation),
“A mother must be physically strong, emotionally stronger, and spiritually strongest.” This is the message that Pascale Burns, mother of four and Midtown Educational Foundation advocate, shared with more than 200 mothers on Saturday, Feb. 18.
And art doesn't have to cost anything in a funtastic play space! Have your munchkins spend an afternoon whipping up some of their own masterpieces to display, hang a memo board full of pics of them in action or display their hand made sculptures on shelving! Opportunities are endless really! Another fantastic place to look for inexpensive art is on AllPosters.com, in which very inexpensive poster prints can be snagged and framed! Whatever is clever, this space is definitely deserving!
You have recently released you album Earned through Blood, how did it feel to have your music released on platforms such as iTunes and Amazon, what new material can we look forward too?
-My massive adrenaline rush after my first book signing last night. A HUGE thank you to all of you who came out to the library last night to listen to me share about my quilts and my new book. The evening totally excedded my expectations. YAY!!! After that, how could I sleep? The way I see it, if you can't sleep, why not quilt?!? :) I finished this top about 1 this morning. :)
Some ideas:
Again had the cayenne/lemon water and green juice in the morning. By 10:30 I was fairly hungry, though it is suggested not to eat until after noon, so I sipped on green tea all morning. Being at work and smelling the bagels my co-workers were toasting and enjoying was a bit difficult, but I'm committed! Also, today was community lunch day at work where we all eat a catered lunch together at a round table. I had lots of questions to field as to why I was eating raw veggies and quinoa instead of the delicious smelling mexican food. I found that I didn't even crave the Mexican and was MORE than happy with my delicious home made lunch! Day 2 was also the day that Emmett got neutered, so I left work a little early to pick him up. By the time I got home around 5:30 I was starving because I had skipped an afternoon snack. My dinner of spinach, avocado, and tofu "egg(less)" salad hit the spot. I rounded out the night with some green tea and a snack of a sliced pear and almond butter. So far, so good!
The rustle of his silken shirt against my bare back where the cocktail dress Delilah did me up in dips, eases my tension as the need to have him spill his guts is subdued by his aptitude at soothing me, which becomes achingly apparent.
to find our own voice
There's a raspy spectre of cinnamon, spice-like, caramel infusion in the body of it which is untempered by the over-maltiness. Whatever malt they used has some milky foliage to speak of. Some kind of a lactose nipple in the sky feeding off dirty space junk. Or akin to a Dirty Bastard but with lighter pollution. A scotch with wood smoke. All right, this is evolving into Robert Burnsesque poetry and before I start speaking of me luve I will bow out, hackneyed, defeated and ready for the second round of my grain water surfeit.
Can You Live On Social Media Alone? These Two Travelers Swap Cities To Find Out
AppleWeb HD – Make your iPhone look like the Apple web site.
Last year, the award ceremony was held in Toronto. – IANS
Well, I finished Part 1 of Bolano’s 2666 and then put it down. I was not inspired or excited about what I had thus far read, nor was I inspired or excited to continue. I even called a literati friend who I happen to know loved Bolano’s The Savage Detectives. He couldn’t help, having been unable to slog through it himself. That was all I needed to officially table 2666. After that experience, I needed something slightly more fast paced, so I hefted Stephen King’s Under the Dome onto my lap and began to read.
I've noticed this a lot. People are just not meant to carry sadness and stress alone. We all need laughter, love and small snippets of joy to thrive. Beauty is not just good rest, good genes and makeup, it really is a state of mind! Friends, loved ones and people invested in humanity are so important to our well being!
I highly recommend seeing it like I did, with a packed audience of smart ass horror fans. The level of snarky applause that greeted Lynda's multiple bastard line was glorious.
Penninn-Eymundsson are book and stationery stores situated in many areas across Reykjavík and throughout Iceland. These stores stock Icelandic and foreign books, stationery, giftware, postcards and so on. At Penninn-Eymundsson you can find everything in relation to books, writing and gifts. There are also branches at Kringlan and Smáralind shopping malls.
3 AM Wednesday, 22 March 2012 Nunhead
I am entering the following challenges with this card:
Who’s in the mood for some more branded collateral? (Starts a slow clap.)
A. They're a Fortune 500 medical company.
Where the trees look like this ...
-The Drudge Report (www.drudgereport.com). Yes, Matt does lean conservative. However, there are regular links to Maureen Dowd, Dick Morris, Helen Thomas and other liberals, as well as the BBC and the major news outlets (ABC, CBS, NY Times, Boston Globe, etc.).
Flower bag or box Border Piece Transportation image Frame
Photographing just the sky is fine, and even better if you can get something significant in the sky to reference the ISS path, i.e. passing Mars, or Saturn. However, get the land in the shot and you’re starting to tell a story with your shot, you’re showing the whole event. The pass of this object over the scene you’re looking at. So tell me whats better here…
I am going to leave you with a little sneak peak of something that you will see more of on the 24th of this month.
and smaller
If you've been a reader of mine for any stretch of time, you know this about me: I'm blessed. Incredibly blessed. The kids and I have been the recipients of some totally humbling acts of kindness (a complete Christmas dinner delivered on our doorstep, gift cards to stores and restaurants, boxes of clothes and accessories, etc.)...some from people we know personally, others from complete strangers.
It seemed to him that he had never seen anything as lovely as the curve of her dark eyelashes resting on the softness of her cheek, and he touched her hair very gently, letting one golden curl wind itself round his finger.
Such was the lofty original state of man and the creation, and such was man’s lofty original calling. But as we all know and experience every day, the first man, Adam, fell from this state and brought himself and all of creation into a state of corruption and death.
“Yet each year, to placate civil servants, the PM will appear on TV to say, we honour our civil servants because they have done a good job, blah blah. Which is not entirely true. The service is slow, the quality of officers is questionable.”
These bars combine the crunchiness of oats with the softness of spelt and barley flour; they are dairy, egg and refined sugar free. Try ‘em out and let me know what you think! Feel free to experiment yourselves and trade some of the ingredients for own favourites or whatever you have on hand.
To wrap up this tutorial, Google Analytics is a powerful tool that should be examined on a very regular basis, at the very least weekly. Plan for your Blog goals based on these numbers and your Blog will be very successful over the long haul and possibly generate income based on its popularity.
c. Lastly the IRS would have to be dismantled and replaced with a national sales tax. This is the basis of the NESARA Law.
Within my heart is ringing.
a lovely thought; after all, what author hasn’t experienced such mixed feelings about their characters’
But although there are a younger sister with longings to go on Britain's Got Talent, love interest in a mystery boys and some delicious side swipes at the fashion for Paranormal Romance for teens, this is not a frivolous book.
First of all, park your behind on this fantastic blanket:
or what a great gift this could be for your sister or best friend.
that would be setting myself up for failure.
Moving on to Dec. 3, 2011, and the Mistletoe Half Marathon, a historically epic race known for its postrace buffet, runners dressed in their best Santa Claus and elf attire, a hilly but beautiful course, and reuniting with old and new friends. For many, it is the last race of the season. I have done it every year since 2006 except for last year, when I traded my running shoes for margaritas and Bloody Marys on a Belize beach at 9 a.m. (honeymoon!). Not wanting to miss another Mistletoe and excited about crossing another finish line with Jeff, we signed up and began our preparations.
This blog has been incredibly therapeutic to me over the last two years. I still ocassionally find myself reading some of my earlier posts. It has been quite a journey. The reality is - the rediscovery of me is ongoing. Its supposed to be that way. When I originally started the blog - I used my fat as the "reason" I was writing. While I may have been overweight - the ultimate healing came, not in the weight loss, but in the discovery of what makes me happy.
The Sultan Qaboos Centre for Islamic Culture is responsible for all the award’s specialisations and its application.
Last month I left Santa Fe and moved to Providence, Rhode Island. I'd spent almost five years in Santa Fe and loved a lot about the city--there were other things I liked less. I loved the mountains and the sunsets and my friends in Santa Fe; the state government, the lack of customer service attitude, the problems with the educational system, the drought and thunderstorms--not so much.
My soul prepared in the mountains absorbs your immortal strong
Smiley Faces - When we catch our littles doing a good deed, something selfless, putting others first, etc. they get a smily face. Once they have seven smiley faces they get to choose something fun to do with their Dad. Chuck E. Cheese and roller skating have been among the faves. Success! Finally! We have stuck with this for over four years. Why were we able to stick with this one? It's easy and it works for us. Plain and simple. We have a chalkboard wall in our kitchen and now our boys are old enough to grab the chalk and add their own smiley face when asked to do so.
This lip gloss is formulated with plant derived antioxidants like green tea and grape see extracts to deliver outstanding regenerative properties and anti-aging capabilities, as well as aloe vera and avocado oil - both of which are full of essential vitamins, are antibacterial and highly emollient. Glides on smooth, non-sticky, and gives lips plenty of shine.
image copyright Adobe Inc.
I think for too long of a time, I lost myself. It was an inexplicable descent where I got angrier without good reason. I had more trouble thinking through ideas and conceptualizing anything. I had no energy at any point of the day and I had very little desire. The minor victories only helped patch the low points with decreasing frequency. Added to that is the guilt associated with neglecting family throughout the year for the last 5 years.
- The Franklin Avenue storefront boom continues to hurtle along - at this point, I count over 20 new shops and restaurants on or just off Franklin that have opened (or are in the process of opening) since the first post. There's a lot to be excited about, but the question of displacement looms large over the process - with so many competing claims on space (the Daily News just picked up the co-naming story), can Franklin accommodate everyone?
8A. Standard/Ordinary Bitter
“Hey, since Kevin died I’ve been a very good boy,” I protested.
This summer when the brothers Elling and Audun cut the trees for this church, Erling Jarl was killed in the battle of Nidaros.
Pia stepped it up a little, but was falling into the same AFE trap. Jacob simply had the misfortune of leading off the show this week. I don't think he's going to win, but he was better than just about everyone else last night and that still gets him into the bottom 3. He also need some new (read: less gay) dance moves.
about six months ago, had
Hina’s mother was so deeply disheartened that she couldn’t manage her self. Every one present there tried to calm down her but the grief was beyond her endurance. The environment was very depressing. Some ladies recited holy verses from Quran. Some passed comments on Hina’s illness or death. Her mother caressed Hina’s hair and face weeping continuously.
After shrinking with the heat gun I immediately flattened the frame with A cover a card stamp inked with stazon pressing hard to texture the plastic.
Enjoy the ideas found in this quote from the book Entre Nous (meaning "Between Us", in French. I googled it.) by Debra Ollivier~
Canberra was the setting for the Seventh Assembly of the World Council of Churches in 1991 and the evangelical responses were decidedly cool. What disappointed them was not only an absence of a real theology of the Holy Spirit at an Assembly devoted to that theme but the presence of so much overt syncretism, denying the uniqueness of Christ (Beyond Canberra, Regnum Books, 1993). As ecumenism becomes more free from its Biblical moorings we must not be surprised that the ship is sailing closer to these rocks. Domestically, Methodist discussions with the Church of England are said to be on course for a gradual integrating of ministries but full inter-communion may have to wait until Anglicans admit women bishops, since Methodists already have women in their equivalent of the episcopate. The Anglicans will vote ftrst in 1997 and, if they agree to proceed, the Methodists will consider their options in 1998. The United Reformed Church already has 200 joint congregations with Methodists and has an observer at these talks.
Die from Marianne design
The nurses kept reassuring me, telling me her Apgars were 8 & 9.
The key? Measure results. The outcome, a vibrant engaged, enthusiastic workforce and a focused organization. What could be better than that?
The spokesman let slip that Jacky Creft, the Minister for Education and Maurice's partner, is 'up there with Maurice'.
½ cup green capsicum, chopped
Oh, and another interesting point about Costa Rica…NO ADDRESSES. What I mean by this is that the local Walmart is not located at 534 Silada Street; rather its address is referred to as its distance relative to the closest noticeable landmark (ex. 100 meters east of San Pedro gas station and two houses to the left). This is the address that is written on the mailing addresses if for example you wanted to write a letter to Walmart…weird huh? So why am I telling you this? Well, basically last night we had quite a bit of trouble trying to find my sister’s house, since the taxi didn’t know where it was and well…neither did she. I’ll leave that story for another time -_-
And so, it ends.
people have been asking:
If you like the Friday Puzzles, I have produced a kindle ebook containing 101 of the previous Friday Puzzles! It is called PUZZLED and is available in the UK here and USA here. There is also a blog page containing 101 of the puzzles here.
I’m gonna sing the blues ’cause that’s the way that I feel
Cashew nuts, ½ cup (optional)
For more great shots checkout my site at – www.natenickels.smugmug.com
Let us try to imbue our lives with a balance of din and chesed, and with this may we merit to reach the level of Avraham, “V’hit’halech lifanei v’heyei tamim” – to walk before Hashem and reach perfection.
This is one reason why I have right along stuck with a “major player” like Microsoft or Apple for these sort of items. My documents have been in Word format since the dawn of time, it seems. My email has been in Outlook PST files. I will admit, though, that I was bitten by this when I imported my CD library to the Zune software… only to have Microsoft eventually kill off the Zune players. I didn’t see that one coming, and it’s a perfect example of the problem I mentioned above. Here I was with a ton of music, some of it DRM-locked because I purchased it from the Windows Media store, on a platform that became unsupported. It was possible for me to buy another brand of mp3 player and hopefully use the majority of my WMA files there… but by that point, I wanted to regain stability, and I ended up buying an iPod as a result.
Account holders at BS are sent a copy of the Prestige Magazine which runs a photography competition to which all readers are invited to submit photos themed on Spain.
I put a map for the background to go with "story map." However, when I showed it to my colleague to preview she asked me, "Why do you have a flag in the background?" Hahah....SO it might come across looking like a flag:) You can just decide for yourself if you would like to use one!
'You're more than a bit late - he died 6 months ago' was the receptionists reply!
Jesus in verse 37 says of those who come to Him “I will always accept them”. He came down from heaven with a purpose: To bring us back to God. Most of us know this, most of us see and acknowledge His work in others. Yet, we expect He will reject us, because “know one else is as bad as me”.
“We take any such allegation extremely seriously,” the British Ministry of Defense said. “It would be inappropriate to comment further while an investigation is ongoing.”
When people hear the word “introvert,” it may conjure up the image of a shy and meek kid in school, who wants to be outgoing and sociable, and just has to get over her fears.
RELATED TRAINING:
Welcome to my first Try Something New Tuesday! I am so excited about the weekly feature as I have made the commitment to try a new recipe once a week, quite the undertaking if you know me personally! I am a creature of habit. I find my self making the same things over and over and it is getting BORING! So I hope you enjoy the new weekly feature and let me know if you try any of the recipes and your thoughts!
Hello Sisters!!! I know it's been a very very long time!!! All of my "sisters" are doing well and we all hope you have had a wonderful Christmas!!! I know my little girls did. It is so exciting to see them open all their gifts for Christmas.
My father-in-law is in the final stage of prostate cancer. He is becoming more dependant on family members to help him with day-do-day activities, and really only trusts DH to help him with anything sensitive. Yesterday we decided that DH would begin staying overnight with him. Obviously it is the right thing for him, and I wouldn't have it any other way. Of course he needs DH more than I do. And of course I feel so selfish when I think that we will have to put off TTC until he is gone. I don't want to think like that, I feel horrible typing it. But it's true and it does sting a little.
I created a matching party sign and placed it in a frame and added a soft pink ribbon tied in a bow on the top. I stacked brown craft boxes and tied them with a black satin bow and added a party tag from the printable collection for the perfect touch.
It’s not about you. Don’t talk about yourself or add your own opinion. Your questions can be long enough to add information or interest about the topic, but the interviewee is who the audience wants to hear from.
The days just slip away
This Could Be the Start of Something, Jack Jones
I've checked my email like twenty times today.
11And he said unto me, Thou must prophesy again before many peoples, and nations, and tongues, and kings.
I was reading the free little local paper and came to that page--you know--connections---the dating column.
Angry Pregnant lady: (oh balloons, friends, my birthday...) OMG, I'm so sorry, I'm so excited to see everyone!!!
To bring out the irony of inter-community marriage into the foreground, the author has kindled an affair between a Punjabi, Krish and a, Tamil Brahmin Ananya. The book features the first person point of view, lot of dialogue and no or very little monologue and soliloquies. The book does not has a long cast of characters, only a few well-woven characters are found. Other than Krish and Ananya the characters are their respective families only and that two three from each sides. Character development is minimal. The characters are flat, and end as they have started, that is, they posses the same character from the start to the end.
* There are many episodes that although I feel connected to Locke's issues, I can see connect to Jack's journey.
What will become of our land?
“You like me?” I asked absolutely confused.
Samuel Adams Boston Ale
So much of the fun of watching the two of you is seeing the dynamic of a husband-and-wife creative team. Is there anything that you feel that each of you does better because of your partnership?
For the author of Matthew, “on the third day,” after “three days and three nights” and “after three days” (even before the third day, i.e. “until the third day”) all are used interchangeably, and this is within the same Gospel.
What I'm looking forward to: Packing away the guest room bed, and getting this room going. Can't wait to start hanging and decorating, all the fun things!
I thought she might look cute with a fabric heart applique on her front and a nice co-ordinating ribbon around her neck. She'll have to wait a few weeks for her makeover though until I make her some brothers and sisters.
My 12 year old had his tonsils and adenoids removed last week and he is in so much pain, my poor baby. I feel like the worst parent in the world for "doing" this to him but it had to be done, strep throat 5 times in 1 year is a bit much. His recovery has been slow going and now he has the dreaded bad breath that everyone told me about. He get with in 1 foot of me I have to step back. He won't take his Vicodin that was prescribed for him, he said it made him feel funny. Is that a good sign that he will not be into trying drugs in high school? I sure hope so!
Contrariwise, I arrived yesterday with a determined, pleasant attitude. In response, most of my employees and coworkers exhibited a similar attitude. The workload was the same as it was on Friday which meant that we would be spread thin by performing three autopsies simultaneously all day without a break. The stress level was equally as high. The difference: we each took control of our attitudes and were champions for one another.
The word “noob” is something you hear regularly in Massively multiplayer games, and non more so than in World of warcraft. Tonight I’d like differentiate between what I see to be three different types of “noobs” that you will experience during your levelling up in the WoW dungeons.
In the midst of disaster, free us from all despondency and sinful anger,
I mean, that's not to say that writers with blonde hair can never write blonde heroines. It's not to say that sraight white able bodied people don't deserve to be in books and films. But...come on. With such a startling variety of colours and races, cultures, physical traits, sexual identities and preferences available for writers to extrapolate from, I think it's sad that so many writers do unconsciously chose to write about characters 'just like them'.
That first evening, she went to her quarters to pray on the matters, reaching out for the Light for comfort. It came, but to her chagrin, it was weaker than it had been in the past.
I'm happy to say that I haven't gained any weight on the scale - but my body has lost what I worked three months to gain. The definition that started to form in my arms are long gone. The waistline on my jeans are now too tight again (whereas a month ago I was proud that I had to keep pulling them up, even with a belt on!). I'm also a lot more tired and get worn out easily. I've been using that tiredness as an excuse not to blog. I'm still working over 40 hours a week, trying to get everything together to apply for grad school in a few months, and having those serious conversations with the hubby about starting a family soon...so in my lazy state of mind, I convince myself that I have no time to write, no time to work out, no time to prepare a healthy meal, on and on! And that's just not true!
you trust him.
both of these in the early 1980's in trade, told they were recorded by a Boston area
I decided to paint the pale, pale, barely-there gray on this set, but once I got it all sprayed, it just looked white. Ho hum. I wanted the pieces to read as a pale gray, and I also wanted to highlight the great details, so I went back with a true white and hand-painted the appliques on the bed frame, the raised center decorative element on the dresser, and dry brushed the white on the carved drawer details of the nightstand. The top of the nightstand got some of my favorite Dark Walnut Minwax Wood Stain. The fantastic, original antique brass hardware was put back on, and pops against the pale gray and white.
Quite honestly, it’s awesome to see how far she has come over the years. It’s awesome to see how far the youth group has come over the years. It’s completely amazing even looking at how far I’ve come since that point in my life.
Spy Dslr camera Techie Glossary
Freezing cold,
What I realy adore are the Sneakers of Isabella Marant one of my favorite designers, she just make them that you can’t resist……………………………………………..Girls let’s walk !!!
- Solely concentrate on schools and medical facilities
Types of Emotional Abuse
It’s public, so media will be held accountable for its mistakes, and as in all good conversations, if the media group or individual is too slow in responding or too clunky and out of touch in their responses and content, they will die as quick a death.
Can we say this?
with your high school equivalency diploma,
I pull the container away, exposing the closed white vent.
Fannie, Freddie, and FHA are frequently coming up with something else to help prevent another disaster within mortgage lending by enforcing more Mortgage Quality Control/Due Diligence upfront during the loan application process. This is actually all for the good of the consumer. There are always places to make errors within a mortgage application process but with as much scrutiny as there is now; hopefully the errors will be only minimal and not affect the country as a whole.
And as though, through inclement weather, no one came
Hope everyone is well! In the far north, spring has finally arrived - or so I thought. Apparently, we are doomed for more snow tomorrow or the day after. Who is in charge of this and why haven't they been fired? Hopefully the forecast has it all wrong...
Parīkṣit gave Kali a few domains to control, but then encouraged his citizens to shy away from such places – thus cheating Kali of the opportunity to gain power.
It’s a highly enjoyable film and it’s worth seeing.
On a piece of Kraft cardstock I wrote the sentiment with a white gel pen.
For today's project I'm going to make a quick, fun background. Backgrounds are the most common use of the airbrush and this is about as simple as you can get. I grabbed a couple small leaves from the trees outside and I am using some Star Nestabilities by Spellbinders as my mask.
Iván Meade - It was very refreshing to find someone in the city who does new and different floral designs. How do you keep current in the floral industry?
There was only one consolation for this professional sprayer.
The University of Chicago Department of Visual Arts 2009 MFA Thesis Exhibitions are coming. The University of Chicago Department of Visual Arts 2009 MFA Thesis Exhibitions are here:
Having surveyed the small mountain of multicoloured policy-filled literature that has dropped through our letterboxes during the last few weeks, we have concluded that there are a number of reasons that make the 2012 London mayoral election one to forget:
I'll open the door to heaven or hell
oval and scallop oval go create dies
And would I be blogging about this if I didn’t happen to have just such a list, tucked under my virtual arm? Exactly.
However, with Pakatan in power, Mahathir and Daim will not be spared from the full scrutiny of the law either. Both men, along with Najib, will have to answer for the various corruption scandals they have been linked to over the past decades. Indeed, it does appear Daim and Mahathir have been thinking carefully what to do in the event that Najib loses GE-13.
For his indecent act, the 48 year old relief teacher of three children was jailed 10 months on Tuesday.
Often the consultant is called in because an organization has failed to thrive while similar organizations with similar resource challenges have enjoyed consistent success. While there may be a number of explanations for this failure, identifying the dominant coalition and its relationship within an organization is essential.
It is easy—strangely/beautifully—to accept
So what have you planned for 2011?
I don’t know why they disclosed things that might ruin how the whole process. Never mind, I went there as myself, not as an intel.
You can find my entry here:
1/4 cup fresh lemon juice
If you’re not purposeful and careful, your “brand” is nothing more than an undifferentiated product. While this may sound obvious (gee, you mean I should track my brand and make sure all elements work to support it? Thanks, hadn’t thought of that!) too many examples indicate just the opposite.
Finally I added 250 ml of white wine and 250 ml of Madeira to the pot.
The two claimants, both from West Dunbartonshire, died from the conditions which caused them to claim Incapacity Benefit (IB) while waiting for appeals to be heard against cuts to their benefits.
However Tom Liu who claimed that he has been to Germany before defended PM Lee:
You don’t sow a seed and reap a seed. You sow a seed and reap a whole plant, be it quick, slow or in eternity.
We live in a noisy world. Wherever we go in the world you will always come across some sort of noise pollution. This can cause us both stress and sever earache, but it can be prevented unlike many other sources of pollution.
So, last night, despite not getting home as early as I wanted to, and despite the fact that mentally, the idea of choosing running 7 miles over hanging out on my couch was not appealing, I managed to get home, change, and force myself out the door.
There are plenty of ways to dress down items in your wardrobe that you might currently consider to be off-limits for daily wear. Why not try pulling them out and giving them the airing they deserve? A mini top hat might be crossing the line for your average daytime office setting, but I've toned down ruffles, sequins, dominatrix boots, and even a Derby-worthy hat at work. Pair a sexy top with a boxy blazer and a pair of jeans; wear a slinky dress with a soft cardigan, chunky scarf, and boots; but don't let your best items languish in your closet because you don't think you have anything dressy enough to wear them to. Here are a few tools that you probably already have at your disposal to help you pull off those 'special' items in your daily wear:
“When I was going to school, we sat in rows…and did most of our work pretty autonomously. But nowadays, your typical classroom has pods of desks—four or five or six or seven kids all facing each other. And kids are working in countless group assignments. Even in subjects like math and creative writing, which you think would depend on solo flights of thought, kids are now expected to act as committee members. And for the kids who prefer to go off by themselves or just to work alone, they are seen as outliers often or, worse, as problem cases. And the vast majority of teachers report believing that the ideal student is an extrovert as opposed to an introvert, even though introverts actually get better grades and are more knowledgeable, according to research.”
Have a wonderful day and thanks for stopping by!
I was worried about the tufting on the chevron, but it looks great.
What bugs me most is the number of white people who say black man is racist. This is simply not possible.
Even my hair held up with the crazy humidity. Which we all know makes any day fantastic.
Gregory: oh now suddenly you do
First off, I've assigned flashcards to different areas/items of our apartment. Perhaps I'll learn new words through osmosis!
Tim Holtz distress ink - Tea Dye
And so, ten years ago, the United States and our allies went to war to make sure that al Qaeda could never again use this country to launch attacks against us. Despite initial success, for a number of reasons, this war has taken longer than most anticipated. In 2002, bin Laden and his lieutenants escaped across the border and established safe-havens in Pakistan. America spent nearly eight years fighting a different war in Iraq. And al Qaeda’s extremist allies within the Taliban have waged a brutal insurgency.
For example, to protect jobs in troubled companies the rules need to change about layoffs. When a company is floundering, the Board should take a pay cut, and continue to do so until their either reach the salary of the next rung down, or they solve the problem. If the problem isn’t solved they are the senior management must again reduce their salary and so on. If, by the time the Board is being paid minimum wage, the problem is not solved, the Board is automatically fired and the next most senior person takes their place. Again, this keeps going until there is no-one left, ensuring that a) the people that do the work stay in work for the longest and b) the majority keep jobs, rather than the minority at the top.
To me a foodie is someone who follows the restaurant scene (like my sister-in-law, he he, who happens to be an excellent cook, btw) the way some people follow Ryan Gosling movies, or is constantly on the hunt for some rare ingredient for a dish they're making -- teal truffle oil or, I don't know, dodo eggs. I do care what I eat, yes, but I actually don't enjoy eating in restaurants much and if left to my own devices would eat very simply. It's true: I know my ingredients, we get our vegetables during the growing season from a local CSA farm, and we drink raw milk. Does that make me a foodie?
The background on this tag is from 'left-overs' on another card I will post soon. If you are curious now, you can take a peek at how I made it *HERE*
a little but chickened out at the last second. It was right after he said FREE on the frame above so I guess I felt like I got my deal of the day. I also hesitated on getting it but when someone said to me “Oh that’s nice” while Rue and I were in line, I knew I’d made the right decision. I’ve already got it
As I watched him
And those are just some! It’s so awesome to see all the reports, especially when you go back to like 2005 because the reports are super detailed and it says who was drunk and got taken to the hospital with alcohol poisoning, and what these people’s IDs and birthdays are, and everything like that. One of my personal favorites is from January 17, 2005. “Student upset after receiving ticket.” I particularly enjoyed the vocabulary with which he verbally assaulted the officer.
Massachusetts, unfamiliar with their own history, has decided to outlaw school bake sales. Out with the cupcakes and cookies. No selling tasty goodies to make a bit of money for the benefit of the kids. Some bureaucrat thinks there are too many calories. No holiday parties, no celebrations, no door-to-door candy sales, and no goodies at football games. Parents are angry.
* "Patents and Jurisdiction I: Solving Solvay", here. Instantly seeing through the IPKat's attempt here to bluff readers into thinking he knows anything at all about jurisdictional issues, none other than the celebrated Willem Hoyng steps up to give readers a lesson on the subject.
She simply vanishes completely, with no apparent clues as to her disappearance. Here the film jumps ahead three years and we see Rex, still desperately hunting for Saskia, turning to newspapers and television for any information, and obsessed to the point that it’s ruining his relationship with his new girlfriend, Lieneke (Gwen Eckhaus).
Let me tell you something. Freddy Jackson is going to come back and he is going to come back with a chip on his shoulder. Before getting injured, Jackson led the league in rushing. Yes, he led the league in rushing behind the offensive line we call so poor. If you know football, you know why the Bills struggled this year on the offensive line. Injuries. When you lose arguably the second most important player on your offense in your Center, your going to struggle significantly. The Center calls out the blocking schemes and directs the other players on the line who to block. He is the focal point of the offensive right next to the quarterback.
So, if a Jew happens to wander into Cornerstone Church during a regular service he will, according to Hagee get the witness of Jesus Christ and the cross as the way to redemption, otherwise, the Jews are on their own.
My practice is eclectic and so is the one that my coven follows. Whilst as individuals we have various deities that we work with, as a group we chop and change pantheons depending on whatever archetype seems to suit the mood and flavour of the ritual. One thing we do not do is mix panthenons within a ritual. We are Gen Y witches who come from the school of Scott Cunningham, Raymond Buckland and Christopher Penczak, for better or worse. Mostly, I like to think it is for the better. We’re educated enough not to believe everything that’s put to print or subscribe to junk history such as false interpretations of the ‘Burning Times’. We get to own our path unhindered by any religious dogma and hangovers from antiquitated views on gender. Our group contains a trained Yogi so often we weave in tantric practices into our workshops. We work with all sorts of stuff that could be considered new-age fodder; chakras, spirit guides, totems, reiki. It’s a mess but one I would argue is fairly typical of many modern pagan practices, and a mess that most modern pagans would not blink an eye at. You’d think as a Chaos Magician, I’d be blinking least of all. Chaos practitioners are supposed to be the most adept culprits when it comes to eclecticism. Apparently, we pick up and discard traditions at will, using and abusing the tools at our disposal and indeed forging our own. Rather, what seems to have happened is that while I’m more than happy to wield multiple tools from my toolbox, I’m more likely to closely examine if they’re working, and if they aren’t- why not?
U.S AMBASSADOR OFFICE
5. If you have any left over cookies, crumble a few and sprinkle on the last layer of pudding.
And these urban seats had seen stiff contests mainly involving three parties – DAP, MCA and Gerakan. But the rural turf had also been tough for Umno as they had to politically tango with PAS and PKR - the two other Malay dominant parties.
The grammar woes,
Hot Burrito #2 – Dinosaur Jr
By Sarah Hinze
Shop C, G/F 8 Cleverly Street, Sheung Wan, Hong Kong
Most of us married our husbands because there was something about them that we cherished and admired, but it’s easy for those feelings to fade. Yet, admiring your husband is no less important now than it was the day you got married. In her book Let Me Be a Woman, Elisabeth Elliot explains how wives can revive those feelings of esteem:
A hastily-drafted statement from the Intelligence Community offered a bullish reprimand to the coroner: “Just because something is undeniably true does not mean it is true. We are not prepared to let fact, evidence or reason stand in the way of our overarching narrative on this subject.
The narrow dungeon of the dead
3) Because Children Need a Defender For children suffering in silence…justice and healing may seem impossible. But they are not—not when there is a strong defender standing beside them in the fight for justice.
Frosted Designs has a wonderful new challenge up this week to use fussy cutting on your project. I had the privileged to create a fun project that used fussy cutting. I had this cardboard tube that I got in the mail with some free samples and I was using to hold my pencils, pens, scissors on my craft table. So my tip to you is think how to reuse the items you get int he mail as fun little holders or containers that you can alter!! Then I thought why not spruce it up a bit and make it look nice, not everything I do needs to be a layout or a card!!
The same goes with the great British High Street. I can recount several times I've seen press pictures of a product being touted as the next big thing and the resulting product is a damp squib in comparison. I can recall a white broderie anglais jacket and daisy print tea dress from an early Kate Moss for Topshop High Summer collection in which the garments photographed on Kate were quite different in design to the ones that were eventually sold in Topshop. Then there was the disappointment that was Louise Goldin for Topshop's studded shoes and their rubbish final version of a studded trapper hat, both of which looked misleadingly amazing in publicity campaigns.
Often I've said that boredom is a precursor to creativity. I truly believe this to be be true. I'm not one to offer suggestions to my own children on how they should entertain themselves. Usually I simply say things like "only boring people get bored" or "if you can't possibly think of anything to do, I'll be happy to give you something." That last suggestion has never been taken up by any of my children. They fear that it means chores. Yesterday I was listening to a show on NPR and the guy was talking about another precursor to creativity. Can you guess what it was? Play! Well he didn't mention play exactly...but I'm going to take some creative liberty here and say that play is also a precursor to creativity. What he said was that when you hit a wall in your creative endeavors you should step away from it, not think about it, let the answer just come to you without seeking it.
We tell folks we’d run a while and then rest – but at 500 miles, you can’t stop and even if you do, you are too exhausted to bother about the flowers.
g) Where would you go to hang out if you wanted to feel comfortable?
“Come to me, all you who are weary and burdened, and I will give you rest. Take my yoke upon you and learn from me for I am gentle and humble in heart, and you will rest for your souls. For my yoke is easy and my burden is light.”
Even if it's only a few days to Easter we decided to have the challenge Anything goes - With Easter in mind. You can do a scrappage about your Easter if you wish to, a card, a basket etc. Anything you can think of that you connect to Easter.
This book had me at its title The Three Colonels: Jane Austen’s Fighting Men. A book about Austen’s beloved heroes in uniform, count me in! Then I noticed who wrote the book – Jack Caldwell. Caldwell is the author of the wonderful Pemberly Ranch. I couldn’t wait to read what he had in store next for Austen’s characters. Add to that a beautiful cover and I couldn’t wait to read this novel.
3. Talking about turkeys, once we found one running down the road, kept it, named it Lucky, grew it to an emormous size, then ate it for Christmas (It had to be cut in half to fit in the oven).
"How is your day going?"
Dear Summer School,
Somewhere In Limbo
The first up is my LIZARD LOVERS group, which is geared toward those that are pet-parents to snakes, lizards, amphibians and other exotic pets. And I’m trying to be certain that it stays geared towards pet ownership. Feeding, housing, health, even shopping WITH your repti-baby. We cover a wide range of exotic animals.
So that's February done & dusted almost! Any big plans for March?
The home of Aston Villa FC is a fine stadium going under the name of Villa Park and its grandeur befits a club of such status; no hot Vimto for sale here then. Following a somewhat unfair result at Selhurst Park, it was off to Brum for the FA Cup replay between us and Martin O'Neil's side. Although this wasn't the final, it was another cup knock-out for Warnock's Red & Blue Army (having been defeated by a far superior Manchester City side in the League Cup last August). Warnock himself would leave us with a draw the following Saturday against Doncaster Rovers before moving on to QPR as their new gaffer. Super bloody hoops.
A Journey Into Surrogacy
CD: When you visited a local prison in the UK did it help you to relate to the prisoners there, or was their situation very different?
It’s now 0800, and I once again sit waiting. A knock at the door came at 0730. This time it was the taxi driver (one of the local men invested in helping us yesterday morning). He is telling me that our passports have arrived. Rob dresses quickly and is gone. Now I sit here waiting to see how our story will end.
The team is really looking forward to seeing your creations this week so be sure to link up and play along with us !
Looking forward to: Revealing the Gender! ahhh. We are having a little party on Makenzie Day and we will all know soon! I cant wait. Remember I am doing that little giveaway for a lucky someone who guesses correctly. You can still cast your vote on my 15 week pregnancy post!
That is, K, L, and I were clearly nostalgia eating.
Breakfast - Scrambled eggs, hash brown casserole, bacon
One of the side effects of this practice, is the way that it helps and encourages others to live up to the generosity of your interpretations.
Jay Reatard - In the Dark
I'd have to say, she gave me lessons
Then I saw a new heaven and a new earth, for the first heaven and the first earth had passed away, and the sea was no more. And I saw the holy city, new Jerusalem, coming down out of heaven from God, prepared as a bride adorned for her husband. And I heard a loud voice from the throne saying, “Behold, the dwelling place of God is with man. He will dwell with them, and they will be his people, and God himself will be with them as their God. He will wipe away every tear from their eyes, and death shall be no more, neither shall there be mourning, nor crying, nor pain anymore, for the former things have passed away.” -Revelation 21:1-4
If you answer FALSE, as most unwitting 16-year-old schoolchildren will, having been repeatedly bludgeoned around the head with instances of Christian sexism and racism, then the BBC propagandists’ job is done. As it happens, FALSE is the correct answer, because Christians believe everyone is equal, as opposed to most people are equal. Very clever. One wonders what regimes recent BBC employees once worked in.
At the top of this heap is the Stieg Larsson series based around the female investigator, named Lisbeth Salander. My storyline centers on Harvey A. Martini, a novice P.I., who by ways of a gross example of miscommunication comes to a rural farm from a large Northeastern urban area to investigate the errant shooting of a dairy cow by an errant hunter. What evolves is a story of revenge and mayhem that goes way beyond the suggested simple plot of the story.
Youtube Fascism and Undemocracy.
The story is full of twists, turns and surprises. Did you plot the story in detail before writing, or was the writing a journey of discovery?
I needed to get out of Markarth. It was too rocky….too oppressive. Everything about it screamed order and tradition. That isn’t the kind of place a thief like me wants to visit. Before I left though, I stopped by a local smith to see his wares. Nothing that poor sod had made was worth more than a casual glance, but he did have some imported blades that caught my eye. Third Era glass longswords, all the way from Morrowind. These beauties had been forged a long time ago. Long before the Red Year, even before the Oblivion Crisis. I gladly forked over the gold for both of them and strapped them to my waist. I also grabbed some new, full leather armor. I say grabbed because the shopkeeper wasn’t aware that he gave it to me. Blind fool.
I truly love those boys.
Such devices can be seen more frequently employed in contemporary film. For example, in David Lynch’s Lost Highway (1997), two sides of a character change places in the middle of the film, such that one side of the character goes to sleep in a jail cell one night, and the other wakes up in the same cell the next morning. This could subvert the film, for it breaks the link of identification that films usually establish between spectators and a protagonist. But Lynch makes it work, because his film coheres according to a structural logic of its own that allows us to link up patterns between the characters, to derive meanings from the repetitions, mirrorings, echoings. It is not that reality is dispensed with, but rather, there is simply another reality, one with another set of rules. Thus each side of the protagonist chases a separate side of his wife, such that the film has a logic of its own, if one different from so-called ‘reality.’ But one with rules, nevertheless, rules which reveal themselves slowly to us as the film progresses. It is these immanent rules which determine the structure of the film, not the needs of a character, or a stereotypical plot.
This is not the time to begin thumbing through the yellow pages looking for the firm of Dewey, Cheatum, and Howe. If you are carrying a gun for self-defense and do not have an established relationship with a good attorney that knows or practices criminal defense - yes, criminal defense - and knows self-defense related law, then that should be on your list of things to do this week.
Here are some examples of social media mission statements you can learn from.
So, for a quick recap, in the last one week, I won the first game of poker I’d played in months. I ended it with a straight in fact and then went on to point and laugh at my brother, sister and family friend. This was when I was home in Muscat.
Important Things You Must Know About Home Additions:
Or has He planned for us all along?
cube
In your shower finery
And last but by no means least - it's the second (and final) week of our DT Call. If you would like to be part of a friendly, relaxed team and you can answer 'yes' to the following questions:
Apple and Amazon are both great at customer service, and shining beacons for others to follow, and everyone knows they are good which is a huge huge part of what makes them so successful. They are big and yes they have the money to do it properly but it’s not all about that, so it’s nice to see the little shops doing as good here. Sure Timpson are a global chain but the shops are small and typically with one member of staff in – and ones you might not think of as leaders in customer service and customer experience – but Timpson do it very very well. Thanks for the great service, we will be back. And I’ve just discovered they even do a mystery shopper programme and you can sign up on the front page on the web site. Nothing to hide. Nice one!
2. Get back up again!
The symmetry of their act in theme and presentation was no doubt part of its appeal. Eva, often referred to as Little (or even “Li’l”) Eva, is an unnaturally good, angelic character along the lines of Dickens’ Little Nell. Among other good works, she teaches Uncle Tom to read—before being carried up to heaven herself as a literal angel. Eva was abetted in her portrayal of the character by her fair complexion and naturally flaxen curls. Though Rosetta was similarly endowed, as Topsy, she was corked from head to toe with a black wig done up in pickaninny pigtails. Topsy, by contrast, was, well, to use her words: “I’se mean an’ ornery, I is, mean an’ ornery”. Topsy is a wicked little thing who likes to steal molasses. Just get a load of this dialogue, (actually a title) from their 1927 silent film Topsy and Eva. In the scene, Topsy is praying: “You got plenty of white angels in heaven—hab a black one! stop twangin’ on them harps an’ lissen to me! Ef yo’ let L’il Missy lib Ah won’ lie no mo’ er. Ah won’ steal no mo’ er. Ah won’ do nuthin’ no mo’! Ef yo’ don’ want th’ debbil tuh git me away from yo’—yo’ bettah act quick! An’ Ah won’ ask yo’ to make me white lak snow, but jes’ a nice light tan!”
So I decided to combine them both into one, and write them out here today.
20th century ~ read so far: 4/100
Megan, her friend Kelly, SH and I would go to the market while Steve watched the kids. We would return by 1:20 so Steve could drive us the 70 miles to the airport in Casablanca.
the "what if's" started to rush through my veins - i rushed into my room - and 'let it out' - i couldn't imagine them not being with her - i will take them any which way - Caitlyn is just badly bruised up by her 5 point car seats (thankfully, it saved her live) and Karen has 2 fractures in her ankle! - all this as they should be leaving for Disney World next week ..
5. Fight clean. There’s no excuse for you breaking in a line, intently pushing people way too hard, or shouting at other people for pushing. Others may have gone beyond the forgivable push, but you also have to remember that if you never wanted to be in the kind of situation, neither does anybody. It may be the government’s fault for not providing enough trains or not fixing a time schedule or process, but what you see in there are people who rush and cross their fingers that they arrive in time for work, just like you. Have a good fight for your space and FALL THE F- IN LINE. There’s this man who squeezed himself infront of me in the line while I waited for almost thirty minutes. I cussed at him, seriously, but he acted as if he never heard anything or done anything wrong. I was sourly pissed but I decided not to add that fuel to my inner fire so I let it go. To all of you opportunistic bitches out there, fight fair.
So I will keep on keepin’ on for the rest of this week and see how it goes. If this attempt is not successful, we’ll try again over Spring Break, and know that at least we made some headway in potty awareness.
As well as allowing users to virtually walk around the world’s art galleries The Google Art Project lets users to inspect paintings up close. If you select an individual work of art you can pan and zoom into the painting to view it in close detail.
My cousin Angie was in town visiting over the weekend, and the day she arrived I picked her up from the airport and immediately whisked her off to the Chez Panisse Cafe for lunch. Everything was delicious. And my favorite part, of course, was dessert. We shared a rhubarb tart with strawberry ice cream, and it was such a perfect combination. I often see rhubarb-strawberry combinations in pie form, but I've never thought of having those same flavors in separate components served together.
Hmm, let’s see. Probably Sci-fi or mysteries. It’s what I’m most familiar with, so I could see myself writing a cutthroat mystery. Then after that would be a cheerful mystery. It’d be something where you get mad at the punchline, but also smile at the same time.
So, be sure to bookmark her blog, The Editor’s Blog, where you will find everything you need to know about writing and writing well. Here is the current list of her articles:
Broken ankle scars – show them or not? Is one treated with more consideration in society when carrying a cane? To colour the grey or not – that is the question. Decolettage covered up – does it add to the idea of women of a certain age being asexual? How much cosmetic surgery is enough? Is silence golden or complicity in being untrue to oneself? In a society obsessed with beauty, youth, athletic level health, and political correctness, how does one navigate the public sphere? Today’s questions linger and prod.
Exaggerated great number of fat offer raise generate service of utilizing shoulder bags as well as being suitcases.
of men buying
Your $100 minimum registration fee is being donated to an awesome cause….a different cause each month.
WOW! That's the only word I can use to describe this book and it doesn't even begin to do it justice. I borrowed this book from a friend and it left me speechless. It's not an over the top wow you from the minute with fights and mystery and romance. Nope, it's a wow this is real and emotional and I can't believe he did that book.
Over the weekend we went camping in the White Mountains of New Hampshire. We had so much fun, but unfortunately had to end out trip early because of severe thunderstorms and flash flood warnings.
Woof
According to a list of published personal expense claims for his last four years as Mayor, he ran up a £66,000 bill, about half of which were filed under ‘Livingstone K, corp card’ (corporate credit card).
4. Embrace change and try new things.
$12- Text
“Whattt-rrrr-ya-doing?” I asked, eying her over the neck of my beer bottle.
I swapped a bunch of garden items with Andrea throughout the season and when given a dark green and very fragrant bunch of celery from her raised beds, I thought I would try out a recipe that would highlight this vegetable. I had recently gotten in a Depression-era cookbook at our bookshop, Alice Foote MacDougall's Cook Book (1935), and enjoyed browsing through her recipes and prose. A recipe for a simple Braised Celery caught my eye, so I made it up and it was a herbal, delicately-flavored side dish that we dined on for one meal and then reused into a tasty celery soup the next day by adding some leftover mashed potatoes and milk.
When DBG began, I was using a Pentax point-and-shoot (10 megapixels).
Years ago, a friend stated the definition of creativity as “forgetting where you borrow things.” If that’s the case, then I have several “creative” ideas I can implement in the future.
For more information and how to book a place click the link below
And I’m going to point this now in the direction of the hydro-fracking deal.
Jon Herington: guitar
♥ Bronze Award Level Referral Hospitals
Katelyn walks to school by herself, lost another tooth and reads Betsy-Tacy and Ramona by herself and picking her favorite chapters instead of reading in order.
The Somers show was wonderful today and there is one more day to go!
A Philip Pullman line I often paraphrase (and I may have originally heard this from fellow Smack-Dabber Tracy Barrett--hi Tracy!) is that children's books are the last bastion of plot. I would argue that adult genre fiction like science fiction, fantasy, and mysteries are up there on the ramparts fighting the forces of plotless literary fiction alongside Sir Kidlit, but the criticism stands for most contemporary adult fiction. Too much of it seems written as an intellectual exercise, and not to entertain.
Seeing the text above is probably going to be too small to read - I have cut'n'paste for you... Many friends and family have rsvp'd already and I am looking forward in seeing you there.
It's our wonderful monthly sponsor for this challenge....
I've never seen so many pasty white people turn tan then I did on day 2 of the ACL festival. The 100+ degree heat cooked up a good sweat for everyone. Then the 10-20MPH gusts of wind plastered the dust to everyone. The result was instant tan for all of the pasty white punks and computer nerds who hadn't seen the light of day for awhile.
Oh, by the way, the rules of the meme are as follows:
3) using bath/washing up water in the garden
Just for the record – Perth doesn’t have the time the train is due on the screens at the platform, just how many minutes. This is smart. I rarely felt such aggression towards their system because they’re not promising something they can’t deliver when they say they will.
1 albion
I like paper.
2. Opposition plot to overthrow the government
Have you ever thought it was your duty to be successful? I would bet you haven’t. You’ve probably thought of success as something “you’d like,” or “would be nice.” But duty? No. That’s silliness. Right?
We studied shapes. Circle is the easiest so I started with that. We had 40 minutes of activity and it ended with a drawing seat work. My instructions were simple: draw circular objects and color ‘em. To appreciate this even more, let me tell you that I had a hard time making my flashcards. I cannot think of circular things aside from pizza and coin. Maybe adulthood killed my imagination. On the other hand, the drawings of these children clearly show creativity and genius. What is even more amusing is how their ideas came so effortlessly. So refreshing.
Work at Wal-Mart now, and greet.
Before watching TVH again for this review, I had not seen it in probably twenty years. I was young then and it was not so far from the release date for the film to seem dated. I remember liking it originally, but wondered if my opinion would change because of all my experiences and cultural changes in the interim. I like watching old movies that are representative of times before I was born. But for some reason, period pieces set during my lifetime do not age well for me. These days, I hear meaningful songs from my younger days being used to sell detergent and credit cards while actors from shows I used to love are filming their diet regimens for aVH1 reality show. I get this inexplicable feeling of embarrassment out of the fond past memories. I did not want that to happen with TVH, too.
But hey, the longer he's out of the house the longer I have to finish watching last night's episode of the Bachelorette on the DVR.
Adjust lesson plan to your students. Be sure to take into account that every year each group of students is different and can learn differently than previous classes. What activities worked one year might not work this year. Take into account the unique needs of your students or how they learn best to make your lesson as effective as possible. Example: If your students learn better when they are in small groups, make sure you have an activity planned for your students to break into a small group and work together.
Today is officially the last day of my hubby's leave and we both go back to work tomorrow! I am amazed at how fast the last two weeks have flown by and that he has already been back in Virginia for a month now. Why does it seem like time goes by insanely fast when they are home but drags on endlessly while they are gone??? It's something I'll never understand!
There are no marketing and promotional services with this deal and much of this work, as with any self-publishing project, falls squarely with the author.
Jean Alesi was one of the greatest mysteries in the 1990s. He only won one race but won many fans around the world for his aggressive and charging driving style. With a bit more luck and better career judgement, who knows what career he could have carved out for himself in Formula One.
6. Long Day’s Journey 4.09 (22/72)
And smelled dew in your early morn’
And if the doorbell doesn't shine,
Then a single white sock floats by, seeming to wave at me with a maniacal cheer.
“Alright.”
CassaStar was only the beginning…
By definition, memory is about an experience that has occurred in the past. The study of memory, therefore, must always be framed in the context of the question, “How far in the past?”
As an added bonus, each section contains "get the look" hints, with product recommendations to recreate the organizing tip in your own home. While many of the "get the look" suggestions feature Martha Stewart products - it also suggests numerous other product recommendations. (The Container Store seems to be a favorite place!) It's an excellent resource for readers. Each section ends with several "good things" as well, with simple, 'why didn't I think of that?' hints to make organizing easier.
And I wanted to pass on those messages to all kids in this country. I didn’t just want my girls to grow up healthy. I want all of our girls to grow up healthy...We want to make sure you understand what you’re learning here at Girls Inc.--that it’s not just important what goes into your head, but you have to take care of your entire body and nourish it, and treat it as the temple that it is. You’ve got to put good stuff in there. And you’ve got to move it. You got to build up your muscles."
I felt laughter rising in me, and the students at his elbow did laugh. I can’t imagine the recipient of the figurine was bothered much, but I wanted to talk to the smartass to help him recognize the negative potential of his remark.
So maybe the team will be "formerly known as the Nets." Some news outlets are reporting that the team's chief owner, Bruce Ratner, is considering a name change. Sports Illustrated columnist Frank Lidz commented that Ratner hasn't yet decided whether to rename his franchise the Brooklyn Nets or something less generic and more evocative. Among the most inspired are the Brooklyn Bridge, the Brooklyn Bagels and the Brooklyn Heights. But the hometown favorite is the Brooklyn Accents.
The Garner Files
Why do everyone say it differently?
“Oh, my dear boy, one mustn’t expect gratitude. It’s a thing that no one has a right to. After all, you do good because it gives you pleasure. It’s the purest form of happiness there is. To expect thanks for it is really asking too much. If you get it, well, it’s like a bonus on shares on which you’ve already received a dividend; it’s grand, but you mustn’t look upon it as your due.
Describe yourself in three-five words: Sweet. Driven. Dependable.
Eventually we heard from our friends in New York. Some fled across the bridges on foot in a mass exodus. Amanda's friend was within blocks of Ground Zero when the attack occurred. Our friend from church had been delayed that day. Had things gone as originally planned, he would have been sitting in a meeting, trapped inside. The things they each witnessed were indescribable--tales of horror, tales of great courage, of great humanity in response to unspeakable inhumanity.
I'd totally make this again. It was really easy, and was hearty and solid without feeling like you'd just eaten a ton of pasta. Trust me, this would be a great dish for a dinner party if you wanted to impress your friends. I'm just sayin'... don't forget to invite me, yo, now that I'm a major recording industry executive in the making.
His rival, Andrew Dismore confided in me that he is worried that Coleman is so unpopular that people will become complacent. He fears that if the weather is bad, his supporters won't bother to vote. I have no such fears. The people, such as Helen Michael of Cafe Buzz, who Coleman has alienated, are highly motivated. They would dance to the polling booths, through a hurricane, if it meant the end of Coleman and his parking policies.
We swayed too and fro, two uncoordinated stoners with a lot of fiery passion between us. She kissed me on the cheek and I spun her in a circle. There’s something magical about dancing with a beautiful girl; no matter how goofy you feel during, when the song is over you wish it never stopped.
A bullshit saying, but it does sum things up. After all, David Beckham's face is selling razors instead of way yummier Hidetoshi Nakata from Japan. A couple years back Brad Pitt was seen in car commercials, not Taiwanese-born dreamboat Takeshi Kaneshiro.
will end each Wednesday evening at 12 Midnight EST.
What doesn’t kill you makes you stronger
Adam, annoyed that I'm taking this photo, smiles halfheartedly. He's at the base of what we climbed.
Genre: Young Adult, Dystopian, Sci-Fi, Romance
I can read what the LDS leaders are saying with a new perspective. Brother and sister it is pathetic what those men have substituted for the truth of God. God does have things He wants us to know and learn. But they will not come to you from the drunkards of Ephraim. You are being programmed to do what the Babylonian Empire Satan’s earthly government wants you to do. That is the main purpose of the church now. And they use access to the ordinances of salvation as the carrot and stick to keep you in line. Sorry to tell you. Your wife is insane.
This pleases God. This is the cream of the crop so-to-speak. The end for which the world was created was to the praise of God’s glorious grace in Christ Jesus dying for sinners on the cross. The point, the goal of all ministry, of any evangelism methods, of every missions trip, and bible study, and Sunday school, and every prayer prayed and verse read or heard is to recreate stone hearts into hearts of flesh that burn with a passion for Christ in all things. The worship of God is the cherry on top of all of this.
John Ciccolo, November 1996
But in Brazil, a woman of moderate to extensive means is not expected to clean. She’s not expected to cook, not expected to take on any of the particular unpleasant aspects of childcare. And in the case that perhaps her man can’t maintain this standard of living (though significantly less taxing on the family budget than in Western countries) or he doesn’t support these ideas? Well, in the words of my mother-in-law, “she don stay.”
Regarding the years 2000-2005, what sources of income did plaintiff Julian Robertson have and where were they derived from?
Dizziness began to build as the cave walls continued to assail him with the suggestion of ripples and tremors. He focussed on the solid, steady feeling coming up through his boots, all but ignoring the confusing sights piling in through his ice-numbed eyes. Provided he paid enough attention to keep spotting the tiny clues - there, the shimmer of stone was muted by a fine layer of leather particles scraped from the bottom of Rissad's boot - he could maintain sanity by relying on senses his Gift didn't augment.
So now you have all your materials what next?
Nothing beside remains. Round the decay
Week one:
It’s finally on Amazon! I’m so excited! Click on the image above to get to the page and if you like it, please review it (link leads to Amazon.co.uk page but it’s available on all other Amazon sites). Also available on www.smashwords.com, Apple iBook store, Sony Reader, Diesel e-store, Barnes and Noble Nook and Kobo.
Ok, so this one doesn’t really have to do with the INTJ, but it is somewhat related to the Myers-Briggs and I thought it was incredible funny!
she will be using it as storage in her dining room for glasses, dishes, etc. i'll be sure and show you guys when i get a photo of everything inside!
The relation of the punk scene to authenticity was double-faced as Janus. On the one side they ridiculed claims of authenticity, through attitudes learned from David Bowie and his likes, not least the roots idea. On the other side punk fostered fundamentalist authenticity demands, stressing direct access, absolute artistic honesty and community. These sides had different protagonists, but through the ambiguity of punk they could be seen as one polyphonic movement.
We ended up sitting there for an hour while the others started to play games in the garden, and we didn’t see time go by. After a little while, I felt very close to him, his life was very far away from mine and yet I could very much understand his choices and how he was growing from it all. I felt very close to him indeed. We were interrupted in the end as we were urged to join the common game and we decided to go, and I left very energised.
Being in the room
Something struck her head; Natalie yelped as white dust and plaster billowed to the floor.
To underline just how gutsy Mr. Obama’s decision had been, a quivering Joe Biden allowed as how he wouldn’t have had the nerve to do it. Apart from Vice President Biden, any one of 300 million Americans would have been glad to give that order.
07. Time
I’m a fan of this title so I’m keeping it I just went to the Daily Post to see if I could find any inspiration. Funny enough, there was plenty there I could relate to. This post, for instance, made me laugh. I took a speech class in high school and had to memorize and recite the “Jabberwocky” in front of the class. If we said it in less than a minute, we got extra credit. I still remember the whole thing. A strange fact about me, anyway.
“I was walking to school when I saw a very big explosion. A car exploded and flames went very high into the air,” said 21-year-old Mohammad Wali. “Then I saw a body of one of my classmates lying on the street. I knew it was a suicide attack and ran away. I was so afraid.”
In 2004 I took a freelance job editing the website for NAMI California. It's the state's chapter of a national organization devoted to fighting the stigma associated with mental illness. When soldiers fear harassment or demotions for admitting PTSD, they eschew reporting their condition out of shame and resort to eating a bullet. And they're not alone. In a culture that hands out anti-depressants like candy to help people who have mild depression or who are trying to quit smoking, what's truly insane is that so much stigma is attached to individuals who suffer from grave mental illness. We think of these people as twittering imbeciles, foaming at the mouth, sitting on the eaves of their roofs in aluminum foil hats, channeling alien broadcasts.
Add to that and here is a woman who says sensible things about her amazing wardrobe and love of fashion.
Suffice it to claim there are numerous people making massive incomes doing this part-time by promoting these dubious CPA offers. The ones which make the serious cash are those who can promote an offer in such a manner as to attract people who may truly be interested in trying the product. If you can master the science and art of selling, you too could likely earn a good living doing this too.
The positive energy among the group was palpable. “Wow! Lucky us!” exclaimed the outspoken guy. He was right. This was a special moment, and we all knew it. The arch glowed an intense pink to match the sky, and just as suddenly as it began, it was over. The sun disappeared below the horizon and the colors vanished.
We’ve returned from out vacay, and as promised, here are all of the posts of things that I learned while away. Laziness is dictating me to lump everything into one post.
FANGS RULE a girl’s guide to being a vampire …. is a young Adult book for anyone between Puberty and Senility as it takes a close up look at life as a female teenage vampire in easy to follow A to Z advice for the reader, the book is also full of manga art which helps show the human world what life is like in a vampire world……….
As Leah's parents fight to save their daughter from a world of drugs, sex, and wild parties, their divided approach drives their daughter out of their home and a wedge into their marriage. Meanwhile, twelve-year-old Justine observes her sister's rebellion from the shadows of their fragmented family—leaving her to question whether anyone loves her and if God even knows she exists.
We will always have this mind chatter going on. Our mind loves to be busy. We can, however, change the topic! We have to be careful because when our mind chatters, we listen, and we remember. If our chatter is negative, guess what we remember? Information is continually being recorded and stored for future reference.
Although the name change is opposed by some residents, the Mayor is pushing to adapt the name to attract increased tourist activity - something that has been difficult in this internet age with a town name that's so hard to distinguish.
Our next-door neighbors to the east have moved away and the new neighbors haven't moved in yet and I am nervous, because I don't like change. Or people. Or people who change. I liked the old neighbors just fine -- they were a couple maybe 10 years older than us whose children were grown and out of the house and whose dog never barked (their cat pooped in my garden though, I'm pretty sure). We know nothing about the new neighbors except that it's a family and the dad is from the same neighboring state as P. What if their children are obnoxious? What if their dog barks? What if they tear out all the beautiful landscaping, like we did when we bought this house? I might need medication to get through this, you guys.
But Rosie goes to the whip twice – just to make sure. Walter is furious. Not only does Gettin’ Up win easily, but runs a truly monster race. One thirty two and twenty-one for the mile race. A new track record. Is Walter happy? Not in the least. He’s steamed up and hopping mad. He won’t even shake Rosie’s hand.
Doors at 9:00pm/$13.00/21+
As revealed previously in the Sunday Times, the businessman’s body was found buried in Atteridgeville just over a month ago, on September 28.
Today is the third day in our new home. Some progress will be made, but not much. Mostly unpacking my luggage and a Lowe's run. We may not have much in our new house, but it felt so good waking up in our home with a real kitchen (hotel living can get old). Some of our household goods are scheduled to arrive on Tuesday and I am very happy about that. As of today, the only furnishings we have are our new washer and dryer and our new king-size memory foam mattress. The next purchase is the headboard and frame. I am thinking of making this for breakfast this morning in our one pan that we bought to get us through until Tuesday. And thank goodness I found our French press in my luggage. It makes the mornings even better.
Finally, I also learned that I can't be a full time blogger. I just get too distracted, so I think what I'll do is just post when I have something to report or show, and if its twice one week and then once in 3 months, that will just be the way that it has to be!!! I want to do it, but I don't want to stress about it!
JLL DESIGNS
That I the hope relinquished of the height.
And continuing this year, the only competition of its kind: Push Creative Presents The AUDITION Spotlight – A chance for attendees to WIN an actual voiceover job with CBS KLAS, Las Vegas. Click for details.
1. position caleb
Keith Gattis
That's because, come Monday, the new Adweek will launch. And while there have been many "new" Adweeks over the years, this one is the newest of all, because the people running it now represent the biggest change in management the magazine has ever seen. Unless you've been living in a tunnel, I speak of Michael Wolff, who has been the editorial director since the fall, and Richard Beckman, the CEO, who came in when Adweek, and other publications in what was once Nielsen Business Media, like the Hollywood Reporter and Billboard, were bought by a group of investors in late 2009.
I Got the Feeling by Sharon Jones
01/26/2012 BUY 0.01 usdsgd 1.25483 02/14/2012 1.26744 +9.41
I would like to explain talent like this:
6 Tuning Up
I hadn’t realized how many years had gone by until a unsuspected moment of the day I discovered a couple of old photos.
1-1/2 Tsp Vanilla Essence
Unlike the Barisan Nasional component parties, KEADILAN is a multi-racial party which acts in the interest of all the races of this country. I
Oh zebra stars shine on thee
“Ya, and she’s also very pretty.”
The office is the entire third floor of a heritage building on 2nd Avenue just east of Main Street. It has two sizeable common areas with offices around the perimeter, much like our old office. It is a great space, with exposed brick, a “loft feel,” and lots of light.
AHA recommends that all adults over the age of 20 have a fasting lipoprotein profile every 5 years. The blood test is done after 9-12 hours of fasting (no food, liquids or pills). It gives a whole view of your cholesterol profile. Total cholesterol levels should be less than 200 mg/dL. A person who has above 240 mg/dL has twice the chance of developing heart disease as someone whose cholesterol is normal.
Now that we have narrowed down the parameters, we even have a date for Ascension.
And the angels fly
The audience was articulate and engaged. The con is small and therefore encourages conversation and mingling, all with a heaping dose of fun with many attendees cosplaying.
before we got married, was..
Pakistan told India that they plan to conduct a ‘long-range missile test in the Indian Ocean’ anytime over the next five days. It has asked the Indian civil aviation authorities to issue a NOTAM (notice to airmen) to warn commercial airlines and pilots to steer clear of the area, reported Deccan Chronicle.
Yet I continue to find myself trying to explain what I am saying on this topic to other Christians. I have been questioned about this a lot. People are always telling me I am too hard on myself. Some might suggest my view of salvation is skewed. Recently a good friend and brother, one very astute in matters of the faith and also very spiritually minded, has expressed that whenever he hears someone speak as I do, he often finds that it is due to some stronghold of sin still residing within the one speaking. I understand the points these different people make, yet these thoughts do not adequately describe where I am coming from. Yes, there are a multitude of sins I could easily resort back to in my life, I don’t think anyone who came to Christ as a sinner should ever think they are beyond falling back into their old sinful habits. I suppose God has delivered people completely from a particular sin, but most people spend their entire lives in the shadows of their old nature. Matthew 26:41 cautions us to "Watch and pray so that you will not fall into temptation. The spirit is willing, but the body is weak." The battle between flesh and Spirit does not end when we become Christians. The war really just begins. But that is not really what it is I speak of.
“Months ago, I predicted in this column that President Obama would so discredit himself in office that he wouldn’t even be on the ballot in 2012, let alone have a prayer of being reelected. Like President Johnson in 1968, who had won a much bigger victory four years previously than Obama did in 2008, President Obama will be so politically defunct by 2012 that he won’t even try to run for reelection.
As a Spiritual/Human Being you are learning to make responsible choices, for you are now aware that your thoughts, feelings and words are the building blocks of your future reality. Moment by moment, YOU are creating the personal reality you will experience in the days and years to come. A responsible person always takes into consideration the consequences of his/her actions. To create a world of balance, peace and harmony, you must learn to expend your allotment of Cosmic energy with purposeful intention and focused detail, which is always directed toward the most beneficial outcome.
Think about it…………………..
To enter the challenge this week, please provide a DIRECT link to your NEW project, using the linky feature below, by Thursday, May 20th at 7pm EST. Winner and Top 5 Stampers will be announced on Friday morning the 21st.
He´s fat, drunk and in one of those checked flannel shirts that smells of sweat and dust and predator instinct. She grabs his ear and tries to rip it off, but that only seems to fuel him and her tights are torn and he´s pounding, pounding. Her forehead hits the mirror repeatedly and she feels that, only that, and then he´s gone and she´s on the floor, her teeth clattering in a way that could have been funny in another time and place.
So yes, lots of stuff happning. And if you are in town catch me downtown this weekend selling my work at the Portland Saturday Market. Come say hi, hang out and collect some art.
There are beaucoup cultures in this world. I'm mean down south here, that would be boo-koo. Anyhoo I am going to make a concerted effort to expose them to a film, or book, or music, some other art, or food, anything from anywhere else but here at least once a week. When your ex husband gives you lemons, you gotta find someone with vodka, and get rat assed.
This weekend, the Sister Islands will see a lot of swimming action.
Here’s two screenshot of the final product. Nothing fancy huh?
While this new judgment might give some players a spark of hope, it worries me.
3. Howling V/Howling VI
I am constantly amazed by the strength of these women I am surrounded by. Ladies, I raise my glass to you.
The Guy Who Is So Annoying He Doesn't Get A Nickname (shortened to merely "annoying" for ease of use) gets under my skin every time I have to work around him.
Put all the ingredients except the oil in a blender and blitz until well combined. Add the oil a bit at a time with the processor running if possible and blend until the desired consistency is reached. Taste for seasoning and balance of flavours. Store in an airtight container in the fridge.
1 cup seedless blackberry jam,
"Summertime" by Janis Joplin
When I educated myself a little bit on the art of making the perfect Margarita, I learned that traditionally there are three basic ingredients: tequila, orange liqueur and lime juice. Obviously, good quality ingredients make a better Margarita.
When – 1 May-9 July
not with those good looks.
to the restoration He provides.
1 pound semisweet chocolate
Wild Orchid Crafts Bbay Pink Mulberry Paper Blossom Flowers
Today, I can tell you that I am thankful that I was able to be there, and hold her hand before she went on, but at the moment, I was terrified. Terrified to take a step into that room by myself. But I knew I needed to.
He wrote the music of a lifetime, a unique soundtrack for the Lone Star state of mind. He left children who carry on his music in their own unique ways. He made five decades of recordings that spanned the globe. He gave millions of memories to millions of fans and played goodwill ambassador to the world with pure Texas pride. Maybe it's time to establish a state musician of Texas.
Sugu Pillay / Tradition & the Poet II / 82-87
271 8. "Constitution's integrity threatened by frenzy to amend nation's charter." Chicago Daily Law Bulletin, April 22, 1995, p. 26.
I was attracted to this lamp as soon as I saw it. I love the amber glass. The gold is a bit gaudy, but still kinda works – not sure yet what to do with it.
Even though I've been running around like a pollito sin cabeza, I secretly love hard weeks. I'm a masochist. I also love being unable to walk from soreness after workout classes and being massaged so hard my shoulders bruise. I'm a weirdo freak. But the real reason I love hard weeks is that it absolutely and completely justifies all of my guilty pleasures.
But here’s what I finally figured out almost a decade ago (back to my earlier point): Men need to be discipled… weekly. (This isn’t a new law that I’m creating, but I do believe it’s an effective principle that I’ve learned from experience.) Morley came to the same conclusion. He realized that before men are “sent” to serve, they first need to be called and discipled. I would also add that the discipling process never ends, even when men are eventually encouraged to serve. (That’s the importance of the “abiding” principle from John 15.)
I once ran for Congress and received a major endorsement.
Harr laments that Duke (who he himself has sued!) has faced “greed-driven lawsuits” because of what the motion alleges were $20 million settlements to the falsely accused players. (He provides no evidence for this figure, which he appears to have conjured from thin air.) And Harr, without citing any authority or case law, criticizes AG Roy Cooper for declaring the lacrosse players innocent, a move he attributes to the pernicious influence of Brad Bannon(!!). Cooper's actions, Harr suggests, were improper, since a declaration of innocence is “something that only a jury or a judge in lieu of a jury can do.” Of course, a jury delivers a verdict of “guilty” or “not guilty”; juries do not declare innocence. And what any of this revisionist history has to do with the motions’ ostensible topics Harr leaves for the reader to guess.
I have been hobbling around the house unable to stand or walk properly for a week now with a lot of pain in my knees and will see the doc tonight to see what the result of the tests are.
We went home, regrouped and decided we could go a little further north of our original search area. We finally found our treasure. It is five miles further than the furthest point we were willing to drive, but it has everything that everyone wanted in our family. Finally!!! Everyone is happy, including me!! YEA!!!
while sitting on her Daddy (kuma-chan) lap.
Now bear in mind that I am dark and they set the lighting to not shine on me directly, which makes me appear even dark, I have yet to give myself a clean shave, my balding head of hair is in a patchy tramp chic state, my super starched snew shirt doesn’t want to pull off the no-tie look,, plus the fact I had only3 hours of deep sleep, my picture looks absolutely horrendous. I swear to god my eyes are wide open but in the picture they taken, they look so damn squinty. Not to mention that I have puffy eyes from the lack of sleep and my cheeks are a lil on the rosy side (which reminds me, a diet is definitely in order, but I may have to sort myself out a house first though), so I look like i’ve just been in a fight with evandar holllyfield.
Perhaps this whole living with less thing will wear off on us for some permanent changes.
Check out these great blogfests, contests, and other announcements:
- Abigail
When you started working for Ron, what was the process of training you to the point where Ron could let you do your thing?
A lot of people would ask me how I was doing. I would just say fine. I think if I replied, " I just want to die sometimes," I probably would have had a lot more attention than I wanted. I didn't want to talk to anyone, unless they had buried a child. There were two women at the time that I knew had shared in the same loss. I felt "normal" around them. I walked with one of them at the cemetery a couple months after loosing Isaiah. It was a blessing to just walk and talk with someone that was just like me. So much changes in your life, you become a "new" person. I was able to share my feelings, without being told that Isaiah was in heaven and happy. I already knew where Isaiah was. I didn't need to have it repeated over and over again. I needed to have someone just listen, and not say anything.
Congratulations are especially in order since blogging on a regular basis is giving way to microblogging on sites such as Facebook, Twitter, and Friendster, particularly among young people. Apparently, the long form of blogging, which tends to be 300-500 words, is way too involved and time-consuming for the younger set. Those of us over thirty are still plogging away.
what i loved about it:
The spots have to be seen to be really appreciated. They are a unique instance where I can truly say that art and commerce have merged with magnificent results. Watch and enjoy them all below (hopefully while you enjoy a pint of black gold!). Thanks to Dangerous Minds for the tip!
Once you start keeping track of every calorie you put into your mouth, you’ll become your own detective. You’ll know for sure what’s working for you and what’s not. Most of our bad eating habits are unconscious, a food diary can help you shed light on your pitfalls and bring them into consciousness so you’ll know exactly how to deal with them. You’ll no longer be left I the dark. You just need to be honest with yourself. And when cheating, you’re only cheating yourself and compromising your own efforts.
1. Finish this 30-day blog challenge. Man, this is so much harder than I thought it would be. Life comes up and gets all up in my business and then I can’t focus on writing. I’m back though. And I’m trying as hard as ever to complete this small goal.
I realised that after a day of charging (probably about 4 hours on and off) I only had 2 bars of power displaying on the charger screen. Slightly disappointed, I decided to try charging my phone anyway and I literally managed about 15minutes of charging before the solar charger ran out of charge!
black sheer tights (?)
So bunnies and snowdrops just don't fit!
Now she seems pretty happy.
Design capacity is the number of inmates a prison can house based on one inmate per cell, single-level bunks in dormitories, and no beds in places not designed for housing. Current design capacity in CDCR’s 33 institutions is 79,858.
So ends my European adventure. I'm glad I went, it was an experience I needed, and made me appreciative of all that I have...and even all that we have ahead of us.
In our last blog post we invited our readers to share their awkward conversations about being sick. We got a lot of great responses, and in this post we’re going to show you the good, the bad, and the ugly.
It's all mine! Now, this sewing cabinet is rather deceptive. It looks, uh, like this:
If I can hear your breath like I hear my cell phone in my ear… you are too close to me.
However, De Klerk's sudden decision to abolish apartheid in 1990 and to offer the exiles full democracy completely destabilised the Party and its strategy. Suddenly the slogan, so often repeated, about "the seizure of state power" was out of date, as was the armed struggle and many more such shibboleths. Before long, even nationalisation and socialism were gone, or at least indefinitely postponed.
As I said at the beginning, I had never written a story before. Oh, I’ve written one master thesis, various reports, and a bazillion lesson plans, but I never created a tale, populated with good guys and bad guys having adventures. I did not like or dislike writing. To me, it was simply a means to other ends.
The bigotry and other selfish prejudices
I Do Not Love You (Pablo Neruda)
A while back, I watched the John Waters movie, A Dirty Shame, and was struck by the soundtrack which contained extremely bawdy music from the 1950s and 60s. I mean these songs weren't even subtle. You hear stories about how "I Want to Hold Your Hand" by The Beatles was scandalous - and yet here's these songs from ten years earlier which would make Barry White blush.... okay, maybe not, but you get my point.
The Court is convinced that a reasonable juror could only find that Smith primarily intended to express himself with his Walocaust and Wal-Qaeda concepts and that commercial success was a secondary motive at most. Smith has strongly adverse opinions about Wal-Mart; he believes that it has a destructive effect on communities, treats workers badly and has a damaging influence on the United States as a whole. He invented the term “Walocaust” to encapsulate his feelings about Wal-Mart, and he created his Walocaust designs with the intent of calling attention to his beliefs and his cause. He never expected to have any exclusive rights to the word. He created the term “Wal-Qaeda” and designs incorporating it with similar expressive intent. The Court has found those designs to be successful parodies.
And no, I didn’t go searching for him – because we used to be ‘Friends’, and because we have friends in common, he popped up on my ‘people you may know’ list.
Forest Friends - Stamp set
Judging from the way things are progressing, we can expect the next episode to cover the main mystery plot of the series.
The day after, I was meant to be driving up north for a short break in the flow country (I still haven't got round to actually going on that holiday) but as the weather predicted, it poured with snow all that afternoon so unfortunately, the trip had to be cancelled. The A9 would have been even less fun if we battled through the snow. Still, the Idlewild b-sides gig was a nice 21st present, even if it was one I bought myself. Who has a sad violin handy?
Many were the days in my youth that I spent up at the Zelinka household. Megen, Emily, and I were very close friends and, with the wealth of land and pond their property offered, we had countless ways to pass our childhood afternoons. The afternoon I am most concerned with here took place probably when I was about 9 or 10. It was a gusty fall day, with leaves scudding across the fields and little miniature waves rocking the pond’s surface. After finishing our schoolwork for the day, the three of us decided to take the rowboat out onto the pond and see what mischief we could create. It was a normal plan and something we’d done hundreds of times. Little did we know that this afternoon was not going to follow the norm.
I think I will just wish you
I'm going to continue training at night. The Arizona weather in the evening is still great. But when July hits I'll be hitting the gym.
Naturally, we said to hell with our diets and stuffed ourselves silly:
~Karen~
Crocs
Since the annual number of battle-related deaths has decreased proportionally (about 2/3) more than the number of armed conflicts (about 2/5) during 1989-2007, this means that conflicts have on average become around 50% less deadly in terms of annual and direct battle-related deaths. For the period 1950-2007, the average annual battle-related deaths per ongoing conflict has actually decreased by 90%.
It just is.
There are many versions of begedil and each family would prefer to cook it in their own types of ingredients. I prefer the method below which is simple but the end result is nice! Kids would love this begedil very much.
allowing this nonsense to repeat.
Master Prototype (50) – Completed the game on HARD difficulty
The main focus of the cuts and nays this go-round is in my business. For the first time in months I did a monthly work schedule, including deadlines and times/dates to work on the projects. The list is too long, especially as I need time for personal writing (which may be going somewhere and I’m not going to jeopardize that). So I’ve been working the list, finishing client projects and crossing the jobs off the list. Of course, some of it takes longer than expected. Some of these clients I’ll be glad to do more work for down the road; others, no. I’m taking a hard look at who I work for or with and what I will and won’t do. Gone will be the manipulative clients, clients who don’t use email or even the computers they have (the extra work-around, meetings, etc. are draining my body and soul) and clients who well, just don’t listen – despite what is in the contract we sign. A few wel-used “no’s” may be the operative words here…even if I have to put a big NO sign up in my office.
After a long delay due to computer problems, Dara gamely started her talk to a room full of professional designers without benefit of visual images - not an easy thing to do!
Be careful.
With that said, I have no vehicle to travel the country roads to take more awesome photos and no internet to upload them to share with others. Lol, I guess it does leave me with more time to read a book instead of writing them.
Kelly’s Heroes is a simple story. A group of American Gis on occupation duty in a liberated part of France discovers there are cases of Nazi gold in A Bank in a nearby, Nazi occupied town. They launch a full scale operation under the noses of the Nazis and their own commanders to steal it. What results is a good mix of comedy, drama, and action. The film is laugh out loud funny when mocking the absurdities of war and those who cluelessly command it from a safe distance. Not everyone survives the operation. While that adds a dose of reality, it does not ruin the comedy. In fact, the casualties the tension. Said tension is ratcheted up further by bombings, explosions, gunplay, and tank battles which all combine to make Kelly’s Heroes the best action movie of the era.
JT - Why is it Neil that most fans would say if someone suffers this insolvent trauma as Rangers have, this administration and then if they come out of a CVA, then alright they’ve already had their punishment but is they come out as a newco. If they go into liquidation, come out as a newco, why is it so many fans are saying no, they should not be allowed into the SPL. They should be demoted to the third division. But the SPL clubs themselves want them back in the SPL…
While sitting there on the sofa, I looked back at 2010, and thought how fast the year went by, and how much I regret not having accomplished most of what I had planned on accomplishing. One more year of my life here on earth flew by, and now I'm one year closer to death. One year of my life just came to an end.
Me: It is perfectly acceptable to be a crazy, when I applied to be a poet when I was 15 I wrote "mental ward experience" and was hired instantly.
I’ll leave you with those thoughts for now, but I will be back. Back to talk about specifics, I realize this article was a tad general and perhaps vague, but rather than bombard you with my opinion on how things should and shouldn’t be, I wanted to give you an opportunity to think about your own addictions, and why the humans have fallen to a level of complete complacency about this very dire situation. And what are you going to do about it? Think about it…I’ll be back.
Oh Yeah, me being schizophrenic or Catherine Zeta Jones or whatever. I have been working feverishly all day today. Why you ask? Well because it is the day before the Royal Wedding and I am just not prepared. I spent my morning getting the house all dusted and shined. I waxed the tables and cleaned the glass. I have been on the phone for hours looking for canopies. I called all around and they all said the same thing that I should get an Easy-UP. I keep telling people that I want little individual cakes and crackers with crab dip on them but for some reason they tell me it won’t be shady enough.
BONUS-JOHNNY VORTEX TRAILER TAPE
Verdict: Hmm… (change to pass if you only/mostly hold the iPad sideways).
Dear SP,
Anybody who has read what I have so far written about the strongly Leftist nature of both German Nazism and Italian Fascism will not have far to seek for the answer. Both Nazism and Fascism won power largely through claiming to be the champions and glorifiers of the ordinary worker and both Nazism and Fascism are routinely described as "Right-wing" too. Peron was just another one of that fraternity. Peron in fact soon got kicked out by his fellow participants in the military coup and finally gained power -- as did Hitler and Mussolini -- through primarily political means.
Herewith I would like to express my dismay at the decision to allow international FIFA games to be played at the Peter Mokaba stadium. Mokaba was an inciter of racial hatred and a denialist of HIV/Aids. His actions has caused endless pain and suffering in South Africa. I request of FIFA to take steps to commemorate those who have suffered as a result of farm attacks and HIV/Aids in South Africa.
I’ve been feeling rather troubled for the past few weeks, being weighed down by thoughts about work, money, relationships, and music-related concerns.
#143: A little taste of something sweet and naughty...
“The real truth of the matter is, as you and I know, that a financial element in the large centers has owned the government of the U.S. since the days of Andrew Jackson.” – U.S. President Franklin D. Roosevelt in a letter written Nov. 21, 1933 to Colonel E. Mandell House
leaving nothing to show they were here.
Finally, I got a phone! Finally, I’ve got some responsibility! Oh wait, I wasn’t supposed to say that part… Anyhow, I got the Samsung T101G with Tracfone service…and it’s pretty awesome.
Here's what's fabulous:
never cared for what they know
And this is only the first 12 hours…of a 13 day trip!
As for my next travels......not much on the agenda thus far. I've been vegging at my folks house and really appreciate the massive amounts of nothing I've been doing. March has Las Vegas, Tampa (hopefully! an invite-only job fair) and rounding out with the beginning of a San Francisco trip. April? Perhaps a trip to Calgary. And I definitely want to go to Mexico in the next couple of months.
Karla: Which would you rather have—date night with your significant other, or, girls’ night out?
The enemy hates you if you love God!
1 feelings
Today, I made a light box. Or is it a light table? Dunno. It was pretty easy though! Now, I hope Teagan likes it. And she needs to not have any potty accidents at day care.
With that said, as a person with an acquired taste, I am rather interested in film theories and want to know what makes a good cartoon good. Now, instead of spending 30k to act as if you are credible enough to talk about it, I just shit out bullshit from my ass and read online articles.
“I SAID JUST SHUT UP!!!”
And yes, I do take requests.
Buy some of the hottest books from 2012!
I had ample evidence to support my opinion. Writer Beware and Preditors & Editors and Absolute Write all had detailed tales of authors being screwed. I'd done enough local signings with self-pubbed authors to see how epic their failures were. I was a judge for several self-pub contests for Writer's Digest, and saw firsthand the dreck being released.
It’s crunch time in the race for fourth spot as Newcastle take on Chelsea at Stamford Bridge.
Shutter : 1/125 secs
You know, I think this has been the shortest delay between reviews so far. Only two weeks or something. I, at least, am rather proud of myself. Also my J-Scribble was upside down.
Daughter, wife and feeling gooder in general
Andromeda Jaunsten doesn't know what to expect from the Academy. She doesn't know her roommate will hate her, her best friend will fall for a girl she can't stand, her teachers will be able to -literally- see right through her, or that her future will hold at least three near-death experiences (only one of which is an accident). She just found out she's an alien, and apparently, she's not the only one.
Do you see my point? Do you get it? Do Conservatives? The GOP has a chance to literally STEAL a huge chunk of the youth vote as well as the independent and moderate vote, over an argument that is purely theoretical.
Much like it is at the gym, I can’t be expected to do all of the work. Can you help me think of other ways to improve your (my) gym experience?
Intertwined with the bribery scandal is the murder of the 28-year-old Mongolian beauty Altantuya Shaariibuu, who traveled with Baginda during his trips allegedly in connection with the Scorpenes purchase. She was murdered in Malaysia in 2006 and is believed to have been lovers with both Najib and Baginda.
batting (17" x 33")
In September, I get a slew of catalogs from publishers, showcasing what books will be coming out in the next season. After I think most of them have hit my mailbox, I sit down with sticky notes and a pen, and start marking what books I might want for what magazines.
To be entered for a chance to win, leave me a comment telling me your favorite course-breadsticks and soup, the main entree, or dessert?
They leave that to us,
No running or yoga this week
I’ve neglected the physical side of life while my body has been crying at the fact that it was created into a female form!
We had a double-check ultra sound a week later, and that ultrasound showed the same thing. With just over a week left before the wedding, we had a difficult decision to make. Did we wait for my body to realize there was nothing there? Or did we get a D&C and remove the risk of miscarrying on our wedding day? We decided to go with the D&C. So, with five days left until the wedding, I had a D&C last Tuesday. Dave has been incredibly supportive, and despite the pain we both felt (emotionally for both of us and physically for me), our love and committment to each other has remained as strong as it was before, if not stronger.
Ultimately, the rhedosaurus is cornered at Coney Island, wounded and enraged by a lucky shot earlier in the evening from a National Guard bazooka. Worse, the nuclear test that freed it from its icy tomb seems to have turned it into a carrier of some virulent radiation sickness; soldiers exposed to the manhole-size drops of blood falling from its wound have been keeling over without warning left and right. Tom Nesbitt announces that (for reasons the script doesn't slow down to explain) the only way to stop the creature is to shoot a radioactive isotope into its wound "and destroy all that diseased tissue." So Nesbitt and an Army marksman (an amazingly youthful Lee Van Cleef) don their haz-mat suits and ride to the top of the rollercoaster for a clear shot, and at last the monster's number is up.
I turned the air conditioner on at one point. I believe that may be a record.
I will have some help with breakfast by using the Meal Replacement Shakes which nourishes muscle and supports metabolism.
I’m shocked. Really shocked. Am I heard right? He loves me?
Going into this show, I was very wary of what it was going to be. The HBO promotions department was on overdrive and from the previews, it looked good, but I really did not like Tiny Furniture, so I didn’t know what to expect.
But this event won't be successful with big blogs alone. We want bloggers everywhere, of all types and sizes, involved in discussing the wide-ranging way in which climate change affects us all.
Since then, my life has been an extreme roller-coaster ride through other experiences – other lessons, both good and bad. From West Virginia, to California, to Ohio, to marriage and the Air Force, to college and kids and work and debt. I went from wide-eyed optimism and a ‘can do’ attitude about my ability to handle any problem, to drug abuse, psychological breakdowns, hospitalizations, disability, divorce, and finally, isolation. I’ve learned a great many things – some of which I’m trying to unlearn. I’ve done some good, and many things I wish I could undo. Yet, as I don’t grant anyone the credit for my successes, I blame only myself for my failures. You see, I knew better!
although it's been barely ten days since my return from home in Poland to london, this moment feels ages away.
Postdoctoral Research Scientist
1.This cookie celebrated it’s 100th birthday yesterday….
I just spent the whole weekend with my long time best friend, Taylor, and we had a blast! She and I have so much in common, especially our love for all things crafty and decoration. We decided to drag our hubbys to the local flea market yesterday where we found burlap sacks. They were only $2 a piece which I thought was pretty good considering their large size and good quality.
Margarita made with Tanteo Jalapeno Tequila, honey, grapefruit juice,
Inflammed knee, limited range of motion, no discolouration.
Creativity isn’t about crossing things off a Wreck This Journal “to-do” list, but rather pitching the list altogether. A page left untouched leaves the idea of possibilities infinitely open. The same is true for an unfinished collage or a poem missing the last line. Possibilities are in plentiful supply if we slow down enough and regard them with patience. Doing nothing is sometimes better than writing a thousand lines of words just to hit a word count goal or adding something to a painting just to call it done. Sometimes doing nothing is what leads to the ultimate end.
To say I’ve been waiting over six months to write this post wouldn’t be true. Yes, I’ve been waiting to add this chapter to my running story since I signed up in May, but that’s a post for a different day.
THE SHOW THAT MADE VAUDEVILLE FAMOUS
Some are thin, others are thick.
Just think for a minute what they must think of you when you talk about how they must “believe in Jesus” (whatever that means to a non-Christian) in order to be “saved” from eternal separation from God. They think that your opinions about religion are just like opinions about which flavor of ice cream is best – just your personal preferences. They don’t think that you are talking about anything real – something that really happened. How would you like to hear someone tell you that you are going to Hell for not liking vanilla ice cream? You’d think they were crazy! And that’s what non-Christians think of you, unless… Unless what? Unless you present publicly testable arguments and evidence to show them why they should consider the claims of Jesus.
He wants to show us that instead approaching the day with fear, disdain and resentment, we can face it with joy and with hope. God's mercies are new every morning. His love never fails, regardless of what the calendar says. This is the day that He has made, we can be glad and rejoice in it. He beckons us to come close and to see Monday from His perspective.
I can’t work out whether I’ve simply grown up and left Coupland behind or whether he genuinely was edgy and cool with Generation X but has become lazy and complacent and is now churning out glib, charmlesss rubbish. I’m certainly not re-reading Generation X to find out. Let it stay in the past and let me remember it with affection… and if you too have a fondness for Coupland’s early books, consider yourself warned.
Christine Lauber of South Bend, Ind., had not seen the Washington Post’s story that described an incident when Mitt Romney bullied her brother, but said she was aware of the story. The incident centered around Romney allegedly holding the scissors to help cut the hair of John Lauber, who was presumed to be gay and who had long hair.
Just because my days aren't already filled to the brim, I thought this would be a great time to jump back into teaching with both feet. Or, at least start that proverbial ball rolling. I don't know where or when this trip will take me, but, I have started the process of becoming licensed in Virginia. I have renewed my Illinois licenses and requested my college transcripts. Two important to dos in order to complete my VA application. We shall see.
Gaming at Aero was pretty bland and more often than not boring for me. Whether GM'd by a sleazy, druggo Vietnam vet, or a college educated computer programmer, it was not so much as story-making or painting a picture for players. It was monotone descriptions of things, usually some pun or two thrown into (like older geek from all walks of life seemed to love back then – more often than not based on Monty Python), then something attacks and you fight it (owner Gary's games had a bit more peronality to them than the others). I’m grateful for my Aero exposure to Runequest and Traveller and other games I may have never played otherwise back then, but even as a kid I knew games were better when you could inject a little personality, passion, and wonder into them.
The Blenders Bar is next to "Usquebaugh", which is more of an eating and drinking place and, although also owned by Nikka, is run as a totally separate establishment.
A female liberation movement should not centralize females why? Ohhh, because there are OTHER forms of oppression in the world tooooo! “There are also other forms of marginalization prevalent in our society, such as racism, classism and ableism.” Ohhhhhhh. Why fight racism when: poverty! Female issues should never be centralized in a social justice movement when there are OTHER injustices in the world. Save the whales, yo.
This was just a couple of months ago and the place we were at today, Hunter Rocks. We do not use rope here because the rocks are not very high and so landing on crash pads are all that is necessary to break our fall. We love bouldering.
Take care.
I had "Room 69" again at Hotel Chantelle last night and it was very fun. I did the champagne act - the same one I did at Macao on Monday night, but my corset got stuck and Stormy even tried to undo it for me with no luck. So I kept going but then the music stopped! This hasn't happened to me before and I actually just had a conversation with Michael about it. I asked him what he would do if his music stopped in the middle of a routine. He said he would stop the act, fix the music, and start over. Which is strange to me because whenever I've seen that happen to performers, everyone just keeps going and make it into an interactive, audience participation thing. Which is what ended up happening. Stormy, Brassy, GoGo, Sapphire, and Charlie Gunn hummed my song acoustically and the audience got into it too. Then the music started back up AND my corset suddenly came off too! All in all, it was a fun night that ended with me at the Hotel Mondrian soft-launch party with Honi and Nasty. We were supposed to gogo dance from 12-3am but due to some whatever corporate issue with their lack of a cabaret license, we actually never danced but just hung out in our room drinking champagne and gabbing! We went down towards the end of the night to check out the lounge/bar. It's called Mister Hung and lo and behold, it's all Chinese-themed. There were all these antique bird cages like what my grandfather used to have but he had them not to create a "chinoiserie chic" look but because he raised song birds. Lots of palm trees. A big neon sign that said in Chinese words "Love Liquor Hotel" or something to that effect. In one of the rooms behind a shimmery beaded curtain, there was a giant red neon sign that said, "There are no prostitutes in this room." A bit heavy-handed but seeing the word "prostitute" emblazoned on the wall of a bar does have a subliminal effect on people under the influence. It kind of plants the thought and mood in your mind and kinda makes you feel all sexual suddenly. Also helped that the waitresses were mostly Asian and, of course, "HAWT" as people like to say nowadays about Asian women. But the male bartenders were equally attractive but surprise! Not Asian. The crowd was all fashion week people so lots of tall models and bearded hipster guys. I find all this social brouhahas surrounding Fashion Week terribly boring, but then again, I suppose to fashion people all the happenings around the NY Burlesque Festival is probably just as boring.
Then again, maybe it’s not so much about meeting God or recognizing him or receiving a calling from him in a burning widescreen high definition television playing Blue-Rays. Maybe it is simply about the very way I treat all those people just in case it is Jesus. “But Lord, when did we give you a cup of water or visit you in prison or give you a break on late fees?” (the implication being, of course, that when these things happened, Jesus went unrecognized.) Maybe it is the attitude that accompanies the service of the least and lowliest, the bawdiest, the raunchiest, the rudest, the crudest, and credit inhibited. My co-worker said to me last night, after I was challenged to a fight, “What’s sad is that those people are allowed to breed.” I chuckled, politely, but inwardly I was cringing and my heart was broke.
Ingredients for the cake
As you know, I loves me a tale of the unexpected. An oddity, something or someone, an event or happening of such singularity that many might find disturbing or just not worth their time are things upon which I waste most of mine. A story in today's weird news section caught my eye and is worthy of mention.
As someone who works with children, and as a father of almost two-year-old twins, you would think that a large part of my core value system would be telling the truth. And it is. Mostly.
Rule Four: Don’t get ahead of yourself. See rule two.
Obviously, someone had to eat the leftovers - a tough call but someone had to do it (this turned out to be me).
So, finally Epic reveals a new ip since Infinity Blade and it looks rather interesting. The game seems to feature a very cartoonish look – a bit Team Fortress a like? Also, the below video could also hint a bit of Tower Defense elements – a “fort” being protected from zombies at “nite”? More trailers should soon reveal some gameplay, for now – check out this teaser trailer.
Bring in $20 – Win a Fit-A-Thon T-Shirt!
Maurice Carney -
Some days?
We're not only less sophisticated about the female body than we were in 1936, we're more prudish than they were in 100 BC!
Today...every day, I thank God for you.
Unfortunately, with all this "growing up" today he decided he didn't need a nap. Nap-less, diaper-less, and crabby-full.
I was supposed to go to TIbet. I should even now be on the second of the two flights required to get there. But the paperwork didn't get through in time, and they suggested this other tour, which I stupidly said Sure! to before enquiring about the cost. Since it was my fault the Tibet tour was cancelled, they're not refunding a single cent of the pre-paid bill. The way the agency presented this other tour, I thought it was instead of the other (and the difference in price vs the higher-priced Tibet tour would just be lost, ok). But nooooo! Without even mentioning the price anywhere, they were charging me full price for the new tour too! Hey, waitaminute! So I had been trying to negotiate something better, seeing as my flight home wasn't for another 4 days, and could not be changed. I needed to do something with that time, and hang around this smoggy city of millions for that long would drive me nuts. We settled on my not paying for any hotels and on getting a free one-day tour of the city for my last day in China (this new tour being one day shorter). I got screwed, big time. Perhaps I could wriggle out of this new tour, which was apparently uncancellable the instant I said Sure. But it would take a lot of effort, the help of real negotiators, and anyway I really wanted to get out of town.
To say my mother was not pleased, is an understatement.........
MIC vice-president Datuk S. K. Devamany hoped the issue, which he described as “just a small issue”, should not be blown out of proportion and taken advantage of, by certain groups out to get political mileage.
Fast forward to a contest. I got out my ms and started to read in hopes of polishing it into a winning submission. Gasp! I wrote that? It’s littered with infomation dumps, saidisms, head hopping.. good gracious no wonder all I got were reject letters.
What was "that queer business of the man with the egg at the Albert Memorial"? And once you'd conned your editor into issuing a 'special' with a manuscript masquerading as a new story, how did you pull the trick a second time?
The three strangers find a bald man sitting against the tree, typing on his laptop. “Congratulations, you found me,” says the typing man without looking up.
Worship without sacrifice,
Forget anything you needed to know today? Good news! Though memory formation remains a somewhat mysterious process, by approaching daily choices mindfully, you begin to bank more assets in your memory account. And, cost is minimal.
In the wake of Haiti’s devastating earthquake of January 2010, scores of NGOs, charities and disaster experts flocked to the country in a valiant effort to conquer the chaos. Former United States President Bill Clinton was one of the first famous names to join the surge. Also on the scene have been Wyclef Jean, Sean Penn, Oprah Winfrey and many others.
After blending up the orange zest with sugar, and then adding yogurt and heavy cream, it was ready to be churned. The resulting ice cream was fresh, creamy, and perfectly orangey. If you've ever had Orange Julius, that's what it reminded me of. I'll definitely be making this one again!
Because it deals damage faster the longer it attacks, the Void Ray is best used against large units—capital ships and buildings. Carefully controlled, however, the Void Ray can be powerful against smaller units as well, if it charges its attack to level three first on a larger unit. This means the Void Ray should be a very micro-intensive unit. You’ll have to constantly choose the right targets to attack.
Before it slips away
People go to midnight mass - I am a little tipsy and write long emails to people I care about - reading them back a few days later reminds me that I should not drink and type. Oh I agree with the sentiment but oh gosh some of the emails were cripplingly embarrassing!
person she expected hovering above her bed - arrogant Jackson Locke, the
I do miss all of you so much.
Set around the time of the Federation of Australia (1901), Jimmie Blacksmith is of mixed race, with an aboriginal mother and an unknown white father, he is “taught” and influenced by the local missionary Rev. Neville and our tale begins with his maternal uncle setting out, with Jimmie’s initiation tooth in his pocket, to walk 100 miles to find Jimmie, who has married a white girl. We then flash back to the events which led to Jimmie’s marriage, the arrival of his maternal uncle, and further on to Jimmie’s involvement in unlawful events (I don’t want to add spoilers) and then onto the subsequent events.
“She came in every morning about 8 or 8:30,” he said. “She was always nice and said hello. Poor girl. That is really sad.”
Now, if the grand-prize winner is NOT of the Kane persuasion (or should he/she already own the Blu-ray), we’re not going to force this movie upon you. Therefore, if you should so choose, we have a grab-bag of three DVDs from the TCM Greatest Classic Films Collection series for you:
*1 cup ketchup
Hash brown "pancakes" (no egg or flour needed)
Shares: 47,802
The serpent shall come from its hole
This is the final part of our How To Cut Through The Crap series.
Does this ad have the same effect on you? Or are you more affected by this?
I would definitely use the Kiss Nail Dress again. With this design, I would probably paint my other nails a solid black or silver glitter while using the leopard as accent nails again. For fun I would probably purchase the design below. It’s like the caviar manicure, but without the drying time!
And finally absolutely no backlinking. Entries must be new and never blogged before.
My card is for my sister, Lisa, who has been my best friend since her birth. Well, in truth we drove our mother insane with our bickering, as only two sisters can. Our last fight, however, was in 1983...almost 30 years ago! We started girl-slapping at each other, realized at the same moment how utterly stupid that was, dissolved into laughter, threw our arms around each other, and have been best friends ever since.
Amazon Germany: 3
“No you will not!” I stated, squeezing his arm, “You’re spending the day with me!”
I used basic white curtains from Ikea and hung them really high on the wall. This makes the windows seem much bigger. Just make sure if you do this that your curtains are long enough to touch or puddle on the floor. Personally, I love a good puddle.
When I was at a recent NYU Women in Startups panel, I got a Twitter shout out from another Sonar user, stating that we had 85 similar connections. He was sitting in the same event as me, and looking to network. (Unfortunately my phone has its own mind, and decides which Twitter messages should appear on my home screen!) If I had seen his Twitter response sooner, we would’ve had a great conversation about startups at the panel…We are looking to connect at the next NY Tech Meetup. I’m excited to go into the next meetup and have a connection already introduced, out of a large roomful of 700+ new connections waiting to be found by Sonar.
… to call that guy who makes you feel good about yourself when you need a pick me up (esp if he’s like a gazillion miles away, Oakland anyone?, and therefore you dont have to actually worry about any slip-ups occurring.)
So, I propose…
I found the softness and subtle tonal shifts very different from my usual subject matter. It made for an interesting challenge.
Punches: Martha Stewart Branch
Hi, and welcome!
When I talked with Shah Newaz and his Bangladeshi colleague Shah Alam, I was able not only to practice my Bengali – still holding up fairly well after all these years! – but also see how remarkably well the Grameen II methodology has transferred to the urban United States. Shah Newaz sees great potential to expand in the New York area and nationwide. He referred to the landscape as “maath khali” (open field), which means there is great demand and virtually no competition (especially for the lower-income segment, who need loans as small as $1,500) – much as it was in Bangladesh in the early 1980s, when he was starting his career with Grameen Bank. The only barriers involve getting visas for Bangladeshis to serve as branch managers (local people, mostly recent college graduates, serve in the other roles) and raising the start-up capital for the branches they want to open.
using only 3 strands of the floss instead of six
shooting
11.PBS (Politix & Bullsh*t)
Unhappy with what would be the ensuing result, Bolívar’s delegates left the convention. After the failure of the convention due to grave political differences, Bolívar proclaimed himself dictator on August 27, 1828, through the “Organic Decree of Dictatorship.” He considered this as a temporary measure, as a means to reestablish his authority and save the republic, though it increased dissatisfaction and anger among his political opponents. An assassination attempt, in September 1828, failed.
My favorites on the first course Citrus & Avocado Salad, with Frisee and Green Olives Mushroom Ragu on Polenta, oh my goodness that polenta, incredible! Tomato Jam, Mushroom & Ricotta Crostini, I am now a bit obsessed with tomato jam.
As we left the farm for the final time,I couldn't help but wonder.If the cows were happy inside,never to feel the sun on their backs or fresh morning dew under their feet,why were they all straining to get their heads out into the daylight?
Sakhri watches as crew members arrange props for the next segment. The props are rudimentary, consisting of battered furniture, cardboard and understated costumes.
Murphy Brewery Ireland Limited Murphy's Irish Stout
I’d do it again, too. I felt a tiny bit like Charlie Bucket, and he’s the fictional epitome of living below the line. He had no qualms about splurging cash he found on chocolate. so I have decided not to show any remorse either. Plus I’ve got loads of unspent budget based on how much I’ve actually consumed so far, so it’s all fine.
When I drive through this area, I slow down to a crawl, and probably perturb those behind me. As the warmer temperatures continue to melt snow in the area, the deer are relocating to other portions of the hillside, seeking fresh buds as this area must, by now, be mostly grazed off.
"Why do you blog or rather why would you"?
This is certainly true with radio; where the pictures are always better. Douglas Adams, author of The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy always claimed that the series would work better on radio than on television, simply because radio allowed him to write a scene with 1 million robots singing a song or the Earth exploding, while on screen you actually had to show it. The same is true of books, surely the most basic story-telling device of all.
- I’m not sure that Nina from over here is responsible for Olivias headaches and the shape shifters. Her reaction seemed quite real. But she is definitly not as harmless as Olivia seems to believe.
In Italy, Silvio Berlusconi’s Coalition partner Umberto Bossi says he will only transfer his support away from Bunga-Bunga Man after new elections. This has thrown the markets into a panic, as everyone insists that to do this “would paralyse Italy’s economic reforms”. What form of Time are we dealing with here – human or geological? What on earth chance is there of economic reforms undertaken in Italy at 8.01 am tomorrow bearing fruit before 2014?
Several years before they went brassy and added a horn section, Chicago's Ides Of March released a string of excellent, jangly garage rock singles for Parrot and Kapp Records that went nowhere (other than local AM radio success). This track shows a fantastic British Invasion influence and was written by a songwriter (Jeff Milne) who started a band called Factory around 1969.
Little Hope is 78,000 words.
The warden led a prisoner down the hallway to his doom
Adapted Screenplay: The Descendants
Dallas police later dropped the charges after speaking with Lenhart’s doctor. The Dallas Police Department declined to talk to CBS11 about Lenhart’s arrest.
Happy finger printing!
When it comes ready to go right out of your calling system makes growing your business that much easier. The NEC DSX and a good service to the nec multisync lcd 1700v, people are prone to looking for deals that will help an individual. The application will need to expand your system, the nec multisync lcd 1550v and helpful DSX staff is at your disposal.
Confident upon the stage.
This week we have a yummy photo inspiration challenge for you.
And though it's been near thirty years
I should have cleaned up the edges before taking the photo, but I didn't. :/ It's a journal page, so I may or may not do something else to it. Anyway it was a fun page to do, and I like it.
Many foreigners have been confused by the reference in English to an “enduring power of attorney”. This POA does not mean that it endures beyond the death of the person who grants it. A POA dies with its maker, in Spain and in the UK. The “enduring” only means that it has no other fixed date of expiry.
The elderly woman fell to one knee
I saw a dreadful TV show the last time I was in England. A group of lazy humans were filmed moping about in an open-plan house. Not one of them had an ounce of performing talent. They couldn’t sing or dance; they couldn’t juggle or do magic; they couldn’t banter or tell jokes – they weren’t even capable of a decent game of ping pong. Any hints of sexual activity never came to fruition and the drama they attempted was very poorly acted. I had a good chuckle when someone told me this was “Reality TV”. If human reality is really that boring it would be better to live in a fantasy world like Don Quixote.
Where you are at in your personal growth – how close you are to love and how close you are to your own core – when it happens, when the shell cracks, together with how it happened – what cracked you open and how – will determine how you feel about the experience.
Me?
Write hard. Get good. Then go out and sell it. Even Charles Dickens pounded the pavement, shook hands, and signed books for adoring fans.
04. She was giving it up (prod. by San the Instru-Monumentalist)
Lamb of God, you take away the sins of the world,
Clippings work for most herbs and while they don’t always take root, they also cost nothing to try.
In 2007, the Missouri General Assembly approved HJR 7 to place on the ballot a proposed constitutional amendment designating English as the official language of Missouri. Voters then went to the polls and approved the measure with nearly 90 percent voting in favor. With that, English became the official language for all governmental proceedings in Missouri.
Ecclesiastes 12:12
“Well, Bertie, don’t you remember how much it hurt before She discovered the lump on your side and took you to the vet where you were given antibiotics and a painkiller? Do you not remember how much better you felt after that?”
I point to a place between the trees and within the parks perimeter we’re I see good times, old fashioned times, pure warmth, no contracts or adult obligations. Where I smell warm smells and comfort food....and we're I see Lisa sitting alone in the newly cut grass.
My prayer, is that these girsl will be protected, that YOU will be touched by this story, moved to action of some sort, that SOMEONE may see their daughters in these two girls. Last night God told me to write this story and to share it, I pray that I was sent to these two for one of you.
We have narrowed it down to 3 names (so far). You may love them all, or hate them all (if you hate them, please don't tell me....I'm awfully sensitive with all these pregnancy hormones raging =).
You are a 'learning in freedom,' education activist. Yours are the sharpened knives cutting though the crap that conceals the truth about how learning happens and education is really acquired.
Had there been more flowers,
jellyfished with brine
Lancashire
The third piece of media in my own personal "talking to God" series ☺ is the book by Todd Burpo called Heaven is for Real. It is a precious account of an almost four year old boy's visit to heaven. Colton Burpo becomes gravely ill when his appendix ruptures but he is misdiagnosed. He nearly dies as the days pass before he is operated on. After he recovers he starts to talk about the things he saw and people he met when he went to heaven. The book was written years later by his dad, a pastor, and it is really moving. I read the book first (it's quick, about 2 hours) and then read it out loud (through some tears) to my family while we drove to Cedar Point. I have looked at the reviews of this book and many people are skeptical that the story is true and attribute it to the imagination of a small boy who sat through many Sunday school lessons. There are also reviews by Christian theologians that say why would God show a small child a glimpse of heaven when He has already revealed everything we need to know about heaven in the Bible. Hummm...I felt that the story was told with humility and for good purpose by a loving, Christian dad. Did this story make me feel closer to God...absolutely. Could this story give peace to someone who lost a loved one or had a miscarriage?...certainly. Does reading this book make you a little more excited about a future in heaven?...totally! I thought it was terrific. The best part for me was how for years after his illness, anytime Colton's family would see a picture of Jesus they would ask Colton if the picture REALLY looked like Jesus. He would always say that the hair or the beard or the eyes weren't quite "right" as to what he remembered when he met Jesus in heaven. Then came one particular painting by a young girl and Colton saw it and said "that's him!". That painting is in the book and you can also find it on line and I just got shivers thinking that you could be gazing at a likeness of our Lord and Savior!
That thin crescent in May 2012 grows to more than 56″ in diameter by the end of the month. Yes, those are seconds or arc. It’s still much smaller than the Moon where we measure it’s angular size in minutes. Remember, one minute equals 60 seconds, so the full Moon near the beginning of May is about 35 times as large as Venus is to our eyes near the end of May. Can we see something this small as a crescent? I think it would be very difficult with the naked eye, but handheld binoculars will magnify it 7-10 times – that makes its crescent form identifiable.
Elk Rapids, Michigan
8 - Help
Perfect for accessories, throw it in your closet for some cheap and easy decor. Annnnd (I'm dying a little bit in side as I type this) I accessorized with some (gasp!) faux flowers. Eeeeek! I know it's spring. I know fresh flowers are incomparable. You're preaching to the choir right now. I get it. As a wedding planner I hammered the importance of real flowers into every bride's noggin. BUT, and I really mean BUT, sometimes they are ok. Example: you buy fresh flowers, you put them throughout your main floor, maybe a small bunch in your room, but mostly throughout your main living spaces. Now your guest room could use a pop of colour. Or maybe your closet. But you're not going to spend $ on fresh flowers that will be gone in a week for a room that barely gets used or seen, are you? Probs not. I don't, anyways. So this is the case in which FAUX flowers are better than NO flowers. Remember that little ditty. The multi strand bracelet is also from the $ store. I have some DIY plans for it that involve removing some strands and replacing with my own.
"When my anxious thoughts multiply within me, your consolations delight my soul." Psalm 94:19
Every day I become more focussed on my future and life with my family and my life in Law. It is exciting.
We encourage you to attend this event live so you can interact with and ask questions of our great presenters! If you can’t make the event, please know it will be archived.
Really want Really funny
Hi all... bit behind on book reviews, hey hardly anyone comments but they get some of my best reader stats so here are the three I owe you.
Personally for me there is no logic to the Godmen concept....but i know sometimes its the illogical that works... Now one may say that if its illogical then why so many of intellectuals and famous personalities are seen believing these Godmen????....
Hamburger Beef Jerky (I don’t eat meat anymore, but my family does!)
in the music I recalled inside the
If we are still on schedule, we are now four months out from my book release. I think the final round of edits before copy-edits has been turned in. But of course, I don't know. I may have blown something that my editor doesn't like, and we'll have to do another round. But we're getting there. We're definitely getting there.
Over all, a pretty awesome book! Just so clever! Not quite on par with some of Frost's previous books, but still amazing. I'm looking forward to seeing what comes next. Frost's next release will be Once Burned, the first book in the Night Prince series, set in the same world as all Frost's others, but starring Vlad! Once Burned is due to be released on 27th March 2012.
Of the tossing trees—
letting my fingers graze over pink ruffles, and blue bow ties..........
Season four was my favorite of the seasons, although I was surprised by my rankings how much I like season five. Regardless of the individual rankings season four succeeded the best as a whole by telling a continuous story that had several epic arcs within the larger one. From the seventh episode on there was wall to wall action and it all went somewhere interesting. The individual episodes in that run don’t all have the highest ranking, but as a group they mark the best run on the show by far.
Marina Centeno (born in Progreso Yucatan) is part of the literary group Letras en Rebelda (Rebel Literature). Her poems are gathered in the Nueva Poesia Y Narrativa Hispanoamericana anthology (The New Latin American Poetry and Narrative) coordinated by Peruvian poet Leo Zelada and published by Lord Byron Publishing House in Madrid. Her poem A Progresso / Progress was selected for the project initiated by the Municipal Council for Culture and Arts under the auspices of the government of Yucatan, the Cultural Institute in Yucatan etc. Her poetry was the source of inspiration for the paintings presented in an exhibition in Progreso. The author can be found on the virtual poetry forums Editorial Alare and Poetas Trabajando, as well as in the pages of the Yucatan online periodical.
I also care to point out that this blog may have been encountered by a pedophile, and that makes me seriously question how on Earth they would have arrived on this blog in the first place.
Spencer would come back to win in Zurich over Walker (53.43), Demus (54.04), Antyukh (54.50) and Hejnova 54.89), before closing out the season with another win over Antyukh in Rieti. And that will take us to the rankings.
The love aspect has a slow build-up, despite knowing it's coming, it doesn't feel rushed or fake. I could honestly see their love developing. Not only could I see it, I didn't blame them for their feelings. That thought alone caused a bit of confusion...I mean, I know it's wrong, so why did I want them to succeed and be happy?
I put teamwork and camaraderie before my course time.
In other news, Ingrid is almost four. She is the first on the wait list at the school we want her to go to. Which hopefully means she'll get in because we did not choose another school for her to do a K4 program. And I think she's ready for school again. We have been keeping busy with playgroup at the community center and playdates with neighbors and friends. It's been crazy nice out so we've been at the park nonstop and of course Ingrid gloms onto some poor unsuspecting kid and they play together the whole time we're there.
The increasingly interconnected nature of the gadgets in our households now forms a network of information that continuously leaks into the ether our personal preferences, ideas, plans, and desires. It is a framework that any intelligence agency would drool over.
Our conversation was short and painful and I was angry at myself that the tears did not come immediately. The anger turned to fury and I demanded to Jimmy, “Let’s walk.”
A fair number of people have been claiming that Book Country's self-publishing service is a scam or a con. How, exactly? You may not think the service is a good idea; you may not like its terms. That doesn't make it a scam. A scam is an enterprise deliberately set up to deceive, cheat, and defraud victims. Using the word so loosely and inaccurately cheapens it, and makes it less meaningful when it's used to describe a real fraud.
Everyone is entitled to a bad hare day
Describe the coolest toy from your childhood, or a creation you wish existed. Or post a favorite fictional quote about toys (e.g., 1-year-old Harry Potter's toy broomstick).
Kate- "But, if Locke wants to put it out, then why hasn’t he?"
Whilst the CEO and top management are responsible for the tone from the top, the HR head is largely focused on employee processes, rather than the big picture.
In short, I'm fine, enjoying myself and the food is delicious. We spent much of yesterday with our friend K, her daughter (who is getting married) ate with us although coming and going: on one of her comings she brought her fiancé so we have now met him too.
pale horse of pestilential AIDS in the 80’s and 90’s are simply warnings to
77. Broken a bone
Two to one.
NWTC officials say this is partnership is a spin-off of another partnership they have with schools in Marinette County.
I stamped and cut out the image of the door cutting holes in the window part. I colored with some copics and layered it on top a vintage face . The challenge at Pile it on is" heart felt thanks".. (the sentiment "thank you" also from Stampotique) I also would like to enter it in the new Drunken stampers challenge to use texture..I embossed the back pannel and the door is popped up . Also the Paper take weekly blog: anything goes. Flowers were made with some scraps of dp. Stay tuned for a show of new images from all the dt in a Stampotique hop this week :) tfl
This week’s challenge the girls go to Toronto to go to on castings for Toronto Fashion Week. The girls are tasked with going on go-see’s this is happening a little earlier than in previous seasons but oh well, this season is all about change I guess. The girls go on 8 go-sees and some girls book 4 shows, some girls don’t book any shows. We also learn Jay Mendel apparently has a clothing line, so that’s a fun fact, and Laura, Kyle, Azmarie, and Sophie are all the lucky girls who get to walk in his show. How cute.
Police are hunting a "predator" after a 21-year-old woman was indecently assaulted in Glasgow city centre. The woman and her 19-year-old female friend were followed to a cashpoint in Wellington Street where she was attacked at about 0340 GMT on Thursday.
Initially, my only problem was the slang Westerfeld uses, especially the word “plook”, which reminded me of bad science fiction–so imagine my surprise when I found out all the slang used is real and period appropriate! Truth really is stranger than fiction. It is short, being both part of a series and written for the younger spectrum of young adult fiction. I say this in the best possible way! It’s easy to get lost in, and it leaves you wanting more. The sequel, Behemoth, involves the Ottoman Empire! When was the last time you saw the Ottoman Empire in any speculative fiction? I cannot wait.
once told me I was worthy
The availability of this trade is everywhere, bars, brothels, even barber shops (2 barber poles hanging from the building means a brothel). For some Korean men, married or not, bringing clients to a brothel is all part of doing business.
Tanaka’s third title win…
thinkable only by a refusal of the principle of reason. . . . speculation, understood as thought about the absolute, is possible only by not being metaphysical” (Quentin Meillassoux, “The Immanence of the World Beyond,” 444). Accordingly, the principle of the sorrow of being demands understanding thought’s ‘not being’ metaphysical in a literal sense. The sorrow of being is the real negative form whereby thought is not metaphysical.
'This is one of the many parts of Glasgow that the City Fathers wish would just disappear - no sense of humour these guys, and no time for loose cannons either'
DK Canada has a fabulous line of sticker books that are perfect for kids and will provide hours of fun and entertainment. We received an The Ultimate Sticker Book - Baby Animals. It is perfect for either boys or girls and I can guarantee that the entertainment value of this book will be great for both children & parents. ;) One of the other features that I loved about the sticker book is that the animal stickers have real-life animals on them! It can be a great learning tool as well for children who are learning about the animal kingdom.
The Ridenhour household has lately sucumbed to an obsession of gaming. We bought a lot of new games for Christmas: Settlers of Catan Cities and Knights edition, Carcassone, Zombie Fluxx, and Munchkin. It’s one of our favorite things to do as a family, and for the past several months, I’d say we play a game either during or after dinner at least three times every week (usually Catan or Carcassone). Add to that an almost daily luncheon three-player game of Munchkin. The kids and I call it “Lunchkin.”
8. Nikki Bella v. surprise opponent for the Diva Title
Yes, you can pump up a Social Media presence, buy ads on Facebook, promote tweets, place display ads on various networks. You probably should be doing - or considering – all of these. However, if you think that just by doing this you’ll achieve critical mass in their attention spans – you’re nuts.
I simply deny that this was at all a class for beginners, and should not have been billed as such.
Hope this may serve to be of help to someone
Just in a nick of time too, as soon as he agreed two uniforms walked in followed by the stations crime unit. One of the officers took Jacobs statement about how he had come to give his friend some soup and discovered him face down in the kitchen while men in white suits and booties collected evidence. Since Jacobs was the one that found him they would be handing the autopsy over to another coroner.
Now this week, we have decided that we ought to get organised for the busy up and coming festive season . . . yep, you guessed it, this weeks challenge is called . . .
And for my future baby...
And for that, I am grateful.
The luxuries are costing taxpayers tens of thousands of dollars a year.
The flowers on the front of the card are from ebay and the leaves are from a dies of Marianne Design.
Your face and body have also changed and grown as time moves on but you are learning to realise this is a part of you, but it is not you. You are that wonderful deep down inside commander of your body and life that never changes! You know this is true and you love that about yourself!
one God, a personal, spiritual being, the creator of all things, omnipotent, omniscient, and eternal, infinite in wisdom, holiness, justice, goodness, truth, and mercy; unchangeable, and everywhere present by his representative, the Holy Spirit.
Sure, he shouldn’t have hit is little sister (he was 9 and Nora had just turned 5 at the time) but it isn’t any of her business. If she had a problem she should have said something to me. At the most I’d except her saying, “that wasn’t very nice,” but it’s not her job to discipline my kids.
We’re having a bit of #flashthestash fun on Twitter. I tweeted this picture to demonstrate what stash lurks under my bed. This, I acknowledged, is only half of my stash.
Recent meteorological interest has been piqued by the growing frequency of El Niño years and the apparent resultant extremes in temperature worldwide which occur the following summer. El Niños since 1982 have occurred so regularly that world attention has been focused, not only on their effect on mean summer temperature but on the fact that they may contribute to ‘global warming’.
“A lot of churches are going to be homeless,” said George Russ, executive director of the New York Metropolitan Baptist Association. He said about seven of the 220 Southern Baptist churches in the city will be impacted by the decision.
A strange look had come over Barry's face. 'What church was that?' he wanted to know. 'What town was it?' The Bitch answered in embarrassment, feeling possibly patronised - for god's sake, it was meant to be just a throwaway anecdote! She began to leave (to make a hasty retreat) and Barry said, his face impassive: 'Don't be surprised if you come across that incident in the next thing I write.'
4. That is Allah’s grace; He grants it to whom He pleases, and Allah is the Lord of mighty grace.
photographed it in all seasons. I know someday in the not
I learned, however, to find out a hotel re-entry plan when you get home really late. No joke, I was at the top of the chain link fence, ready to throw my leg over, when I was saved by a hotel employee who saw me and opened the gate. The next night he gave me a gate tutorial... A day late and a dollar short dude.
I got 2oz = $2 worth of sample.
…Part of the issue is that fewer teens either want to work or think they can get a job. The labor force participation rate, which measures both teens who are working and those actively seeking work, also has fallen sharply since 2000.
It was a Sunday morning.
Casey Kelly BOS E 20
Been a tad busy for the last week so not a lot of creating done at my little part of the world..
In the end, we may still find ourselves at odds with our interlocutors, but we will have honored Christ in our proceedings.
Well, OK that's a lie. The people who were kind enough to pass their couch, chair, and ottoman on to us wouldn't accept any money, so I baked them a cake. So fine, it cost a cake, but overall, we did really well.
I can’t disagree with what he said on theoretical level, but bewildered by the reality and practicality of it, after speaking to Gary. He really made it clear, that if a drug addict doesn’t want treatment no medical person can force it upon them. Because at the end of the day its there own choice to accept medical help, just as it is there own choice to take illegal substances in the first place. So why create a solely medical based solution when the resources for implementing them aren’t there? Not all addicts want to get clean, if policies which Brand & Co. are suggesting do actually make it to legislation, drug addicts could be able to take the system for a ride…more so.
Re-Cap/Update/After--After Party and you are ALL cordially invited!
Can I just say that I love using paper towels. They are convenient and are sanitary and yet I have felt guilty for a long time for using them. Using a regular dish towel didn't feel the same to me but these microfiber ones are fantastic. They are super absorbent and dry very quickly so I do not feel I am having to replace them often. I like that they are specifically used for hand drying (what I used paper towels for primarily) and will not get mixed up with my dish towels or cleaning cloths. Yes, my laundry load just got a little bigger but I think it is worth extra work.
Marlene looked back at me, smiled hesitantly, then turned back to the clerk. “All right. Let’s see… I need White Sage…”
For this reason, child naming is delayed for a few weeks after birth, and the ritual thanking of the father’s kin is delayed for about six months. Mothers take for granted that their offspring may not survive this period.
in the presence of my enemies.
The secondary driver was that I had yet to go street side... Literally...
I've been a faithful diary and journal keeper since elementary school. I would hide it so my brother and my mother couldn't find it. Then I had one during my middle school and high school years. Bet that would've been hilarious to read. My mom found it one day. She said she respected my privacy and didn't read it. Then she added on, "Actually, I didn't want to read it because I was afraid of what was in there."
It triggered something greater?
* Hilda Solis: husband has 16 years of tax liens against his business
This was one of those recipes that I wasn't expecting to like but ended up really enjoying! It is very quiche like and while I don't usually like quiche I actually like this!
That is to say, wet food. No dry food. Ever.
Journey down to Mexico and buy a saint that's made of plastic.
Versailles, including water show in the summer, Marie Antoinette’s farm
It's long.
This ones getting a feature just for its ingenuity. The new video from relatively unknown band The Good Suns, which curiously features Lembit Opik, Has blown up all over the media in the last few days.
Brief Review: Dead Heat is not what I’d consider a legit zombie flick, but more like a standard ’80s action movie with a side of zombie. Two rule-breaking cops who never get fired, a police captain that yells the entire time he’s on-screen, moderately ridiculous dialogue, and a plethora of inconsistencies. Yeah, one of the main characters is a zombie for the majority of the film, but he acts so alive that it’s easy to forget. As far as ’80s action movies are concerned, this one would be insanely mediocre, but adding zombies at least brought it to a level where it’s enjoyable to make fun of. Surprisingly enough (at least to me), this movie has a decent amount of recognizable actors in it (I might have peed a little when I realized it has Robert Picardo with a thick black mustache).
After roughly 45 minutes, Air Force One touched down with grace, its polished chrome wing flaps glistened under the sun. We thought, “Wow, that’s a pretty plane.” Once it taxied to a stop 100 feet in front of us, a parade of staff, Secret Service, and journalists exited the rear door of the massive Boeing 747. Stairs were pulled up to the front exit door, and President Barack Obama emerged with his ever-charming smile, waving to us below.
13. Egypt - What Is To Be Done, is a five part analysis of the nature of the revolution in Egypt, and how various Left theories relate to the events. It argues for the workers to focus on developing their own independent property, organisation, democracy and state organs, whilst supporting the struggle of the broader masses for bourgeois democratic freedoms.
Never the gentleness that can be
These are all questions that for some reason my pro-UNC/PP friends think I should stop asking. Why? Shouldn’t I be concerned about state funds are used for? Should I wait for the Auditor-General to tell me State abuse of funds? Years after it has happened?
This morning I woke up, not hurting.
There was a story from last year in the Detroit News via Gawker: An inmate in the Macomb County Jail accused of bank robbery filed a lawsuit in the U.S. Court in Detroit against Gov. Rick Snyder and the state of Michigan, so that he and other prisoners may,
I've had a father that gave me this example. I hope that I'm that example to my children, especially now as Moriah will be moving to the next step of her life. As Paul Simon says, "as much as one and one is two, there can never be a father who loves his daughter as much as you."
I have a pantry
Direct. VI. One of the most important duties of a husband to his wife and a wife to her husband is to carefully, skillfully, and diligently help each other in the knowledge and worship, and obedience of God that they might be saved and grow in their Christian Life.
“But I don’t want to be rude and say you need to go home.”
Now, who can argue with that?
It was a complete waste. I want my $10 and 2 hours back.
Though you might think that personally I don’t give a toss for craft cider makers as I have no intention of necking their nasty pong regardless of how cheap or expensive it is.
In midst of mortal pain,
Earlier ,Lionel Messi broke the record for the goals in top-flight European season set by Bayern Munich’s legend Gerd Muller,claiming his ninth hat-trick of the season.
Anyway, so I would see Mary, just kneeling - being Mary. This went on for months, then one day, I saw she was handing me something. What? What's she got there? I could see her, offering me something, holding it out. It was rosary beads!
But, yes, as always, there is trepidation; what, oh what, will we all do together, all effing summer long?
She's adores:
by El Inglés
I created an account ONLY to read what Suri was up to. A few days later real life Suri or Katie or Tom decided they had enough and she was gone. Sad sad day for us.
The social impulses are another source of the crystallization of religion. Fathers and mothers and the leaders of larger human communities are mortal and fallible. The desire for guidance, love, and support prompts men to form the social or moral conception of God. This is the God of Providence, who protects, disposes, rewards, and punishes; the God who, according to the limits of the believer’s outlook, loves and cherishes the life of the tribe or of the human race, or even or life itself; the comforter in sorrow and unsatisfied longing; he who preserves the souls of the dead. This is the social or moral conception of God.
Both, actually. Mostly I simply start writing from a title, a character or just a vague idea and see where it leads me. Sometimes the beginning and the end are already set in my head when I start. It's rare that I have a whole story before I begin, but it does happen.
Another hour later, waking up yet again with a full bladder (where the hell is all this urine coming from) I fully understood… somehow… everything I choose up to this moment in time allowed for the energy shift… and that is not the correct word, but I don’t think I have a point of reference for what really took place in culmination last evening.
NOTE: A fool’s mouth is his destruction, and his lips are the snare of his soul vs. 7
Obviously, I'm a dog person and because cats make me wheeze like a fat guy going up stairs, I'm not a big fan. But I don't think for a minute that Kittens Ablaze is going to cause any harm to the little furry rascals, nor do I think they're evil people.
Lots of accessories on this one: Snowflake Sizzlit, Champagne Mist Shimmer Paint on the dove, Petal-a-Plenty emossing folder, new Wisteria Wonder Ruffled Ribbon and a new Wisteria Wonder dotted brad! Lots of fun stuff!
“They are badly mutilated and burnt,” an eyewitness described the victims, “and there are two women among the dead.”
FACT FOUR: My favourite two words that rhyme? Who asked these questions? All rhyming words together are wonderful, they make an extra zing in a poem. Got ‘em and bottom are always fun to hear together. And buffoonery and panataloonery are quite exciting and delighting. Danglingly, stranglingly is a bit alarming. Phosphorescing, salad dressing is also alarming in a slightly different way. I think I’d better stop now or I’ll get carried away and start writing...
- Jessica left a comment on Sugardoodle with this idea:
Fred Astaire, Bing Crosby, and a charming inn only open on holidays? Count me in. This is the film that put Irving Berlin's "White Christmas" on the map. And supposedly Memphis businessman Kemmons Wilson named his motel chain after the film and the rest was history.
While it took longer than expected, the federal New Democrats selected Thomas Mulcair as their new leader yesterday, March 24, in a four-ballot contest that ended in a showdown between himself and Brian Topp. Mulcair won with 57.2% on the final ballot. I considered it too difficult to attempt a prediction of how the race would unfold beyond a first ballot, and the actual results of the first ballot demonstrate why. There were certainly some surprises when the first ballot results were announced.
None of this helped Cassandra feel any better.
he has for you
Still, I decided to put some answer to start the discussion. Here they are:
These both went into the food processor with garlic, Parmesan cheese, S&P, and probably 1/4-1/3 cup of extra-virgin olive oil.
Despite living in west London for the last 4 years this was the first time I'd attended one of the Bricklayer's Arms beer festivals. Shamefull I know. Even as a solid supporter of Manchester and Lancashire brewing, having grown up there, I have to say I was extremely impressed with the beers from Yorkshire. Which is a good sign as I'll be moving there in 6 months or so. Notable beers were the Thriller in Vanilla from Brown Cow, a 5.1% porter which had been made with real vanilla, and the Saltaire Triple Chocoholic, a 4.8% porter with chocolate malt, real chocolate and chocolate syrup added.
(could have done w/o the 3 trips to the bathroom by GG and LL, but that's typical!)
before I get into my workout post, head on over to Katie's page and check out my guest post while miss thang is soakin' up the sun in the bahamas. J-E-A-L-O-U-S!
*kim thank you for the first photo is one of my favorites i have ever taken
Even in its rusted, dirt-encrusted state, I just couldn't pass it up (could you say 'no' to that cute little face?) - especially since I know these pans garner lots of attention on eBay and this one was only about $12! It may surprise you to learn that I've never owned any cast iron (I really want some, though), so I was unsure about whether this pan could be salvaged. After a few hours of internet research, I decided it was worth a try and got to scrubbing.
I completely support this campaign in the attempt to make it mandatory for the government to ban any and all health or beauty products which carry harmful toxins.
Singer joins the crowd
The front page of today’s Times (sadly hidden behind the Murdoch paywall) shows fashion designer Alice Temperley, daughter of Somerset cidermaker Julian Temperley, who is expressing her concerns about the potential effect of the government’s minimum pricing plans on farmhouse cidermakers. Inside the paper, there’s a two-page spread on the issue.
In a word...this game is totally addictive! I discovered this app a couple of weeks ago and am pretty close to clocking the 8 levels now. The more you get right, the more hints you get. And the levels do get progressively harder, although there are some easy ones on each level. It also helps if you can play with a friend at the same time and share answers.
We all had fun wandering around the toy factory. They have the most beautiful wooden toys. We wanted to buy Fox a present but these were too big to send to LA. However we did find him a smaller train, which also cost heaps to post to USA.
3. Hey Babe – 3:35
magazine publisher (SM). If it is dealing with Government or law enforcement agencies then the persona is that of an
Can you describe when and where your conversion experience happened? I don’t mean the time were delivered from some addiction or besetting sin. I don’t mean the time you had a breakthrough and resolved a big conflict in one of your personal relationships. I mean the time you realized that you were a lost sinner and you called upon Jesus Christ to save you.
I have slacked in my writing since graduation…forgive me.
But at least we can look forward to a wonderful meal prepared by my mom on Saturday...and there will be left overs that will last us at least 3 or 4 days!
What was the purpose of this ocean of death, agony blood and heart ache? what did so many give up so much for? For every one, the purpose was this country, they died for England, Scotland, Wales and Ireland, they died for this land and for its people.
Now I'm forgetting my point. Let me think.
$19.95 USD / £11.99
Rain, running. Running down my face.
BBQ sauce (I used about 2 tablespoons of Jack Daniels BBQ sauce as I had it in the fridge)
Through collaborative research and writing, and in independent and ongoing investigations, Richard K. and I can tell you that this “cure” historical research is a work-in-progress. The facts are there. The cures are there. The history is voluminous. The analysis and dissemination has only begun! You yourself can do the verifying also. You can find hundreds and hundreds of materials on early A.A. and Cure—even in its Alcoholics Anonymous World Services office and archives. You will probably find little about such cures in Oxford Group writings and certainly not in Washingtonian history. The rescue of drunks was a proclaimed Washingtonian objective. But in both the Washingtonians and the Oxford Group, the rescue was expected to come from life-change or pledges or temperance meetings. “Cure of alcoholism” was, from 1935 to 1939 a phrase and a triumph reserved for those early AAs who sought the Creator’s healing power for a cure and who accomplished it, proclaimed it, and documented it.
Ike & Tina Turner River deep, mountain high US
The statement was made following the endorsement of Rp 3.8 trillion of special autonomy funds last week by the local parliament.
On the upside I have heard that all is calm now and the fire is under control. Thank Goodness. I hope all you Wolverhamptoners stayed safe today and please remain to do so. I have been told that the Railway Station is back up and running and as are all the roads barr the slip road running down the side of 'Carvers Yard.'
But despite having this relatively well-paying gig, which came with the perk of living in a charming cottage on 23rd Street and Seventh Avenue rent free, Captain Lark was a miserable jerk who mercilessly beat his wife. Lark's life came to a disturbing end one morning while his son was preparing him breakfast:
What do all of these groups share in common? They cannot afford to let their view of reality be warped by willful delusion, just-so stories, Beckian rants and dogma, They don't have the time for denialism. Want another example?
Quoting lead Defense counsel Serafin Cuevas, President Aquino brushed off a reporter’s question about his lovelife saying it was “immaterial, irrelevant and impertinent.” Initially, the President wanted to quote lead prosecutor Niel Tupas but realized he’d sound stupid if he’d answer, “I submit.”
The lily is such a symbolic flower. The fleur-de-lys, or “lily
There is a prize of £5 accessible through-the-wall at any cash machine in Burundi.
Although I can't stop making cookies! COOKIES! More cookies! I love making cookies for people. It is really all I want to do, so here I am, making cookies for YOU.
Mr. Mushnick, your opinion confuses me, but not as much as trying to figure out what team name you were suggesting with all the dashes in N——s. Did you mean the Negators? The Notables? Maybe the Naturals? I don’t know, but whatever it is I’m sure you won that round of hanging with friends. Admittedly, I’ve never read your column before, because I don’t read the Post, but I’m left to wonder, are you upset the Nets are leaving Jersey, a jealous ex-boyfriend of Beyonce’, or are you just a curmudgeony old man? My guess is some combination of the three.
Two minutes and sixteen seconds. Ninety-two yards.
But a skinny sash is better than no sash!
Yes, I'm a color and texture freak! I've discovered that surrounding myself with color makes me so happy! I will spend my winter photo shoots looking for that color surprise, that texture that intrigues the imagination.
The poop picture thing is still weird, huh?
In its tumbledown state it can only wait
I hoped to tell a riveting story that would appeal to both genders, to the young and old, across cultures. A universal page-turner, in other words. A tall challenge! And I didn’t know how to do it! So I simply wrote from the heart, telling Gene’s story as honestly and purely as I could. I was left with a story that – even after many revisions and re-reads – still got my heart pounding. But it was also one which blurred many of the genre conventions, and I was faced with a very real temptation to add a few tropes to make the work more accessible. I thought about heightening the romance, or having the protagonist make more “acceptable” choices, or filling the book with more world-building information (as is the case with most dystopian YA books but which, for reasons too complex to go into here, wouldn’t have tonally worked in The Hunt).
One more thing: Friday Jones Publishing, the independent artisan press that published “Laid-Back Skier” is Denver-based. The Friday Jones Players who contributed are Denver residents: In addition to the illustrator Patty Leidy, and the designer Nancy Benton, the book got off the ground with the help of Friday Jones Players: Jesse Krieger, Amanda DePaul and Roeanna Frechette. We are “the little publishing house that could,” and that underdog, entrepreneurial spirit has been part of Denver since day one of the Mile High City.
November 5
I had about three hours before I needed to go to work.
Now it is count down until Oct 14th, when we all head back up to Interlaken Inn, for another wonderful weekend with good friends, lots of food and laughter and all the quilting you can imagine. Interested in joining us? Just email the ladies at cqgetaway@gmail.com. I think I heard there are only 17 spots left!
CENNETTA- I have a followed this beautiful lady blog for probably five years. Her sewing skills gets better with every garment that she makes. The inside of her finished garment are absolutely beautiful. I also enjoy the recipes and craft project that she post on her blog.
Reading Detective -- 20 minutes
19. Get Up And Go*
He was stopped short with a sinking stomach as Dora gave a fresh burst of giggles. Not good, if her mania was going to return with strangers around to see. Thinking quickly, Rel turned and said, "What's funny?" The words came out sharper than intended, but perhaps the sense of disapproval would quell her before she got too strange.
he says, can fix that in a day or two;
What happened was that pesticide manufactures had some very difficult decisions to make, and they eventually made their decisions based on economics. Manufacturers chose to preserve the products that contributed to the larger uses of their customers, which complimented their bottom line. So, at that time we lost the indoor uses of the Dursban and Diazinon products that had provided effective control of bedbugs and many other insects.
This was when I almost passed out. I am not too sure what happened, but I went pale very quickly and felt really faint. It was just a quick spell, but I was not feeling 100% for a while afterwards. I have been having so many symptoms of a pregnancy and am feeling calmly positive about this particular session. I hope I am not jinxing myself. After the show, I went to the toilet and noticed a high amount of CM. I am still crossing fingers! All going well SPOT and DOT are still implanting.
“Yes, I can. It ends with -tion.” And off he ran to put it in his backpack.
- Soft Microfibre lining
My husband will be using his tablet for reading e-books & for checking messages related to him working on people's cars. That will be the extent of his computer use outside of work. I will check my email 1-2 times a day, in case I get an important email that can't be ignored for a week. I will still use the internet for paying bills. I will use the computer for my online courses. I will post to my blog before & after, but not during the week. I will use my Nook for reading.
Now let me preface this by saying I always cheat at things like this and never follow the rules! :)
I'd done what I could in the past with books about Grace, who lives in a family of three generations of women, with an absent father, and in stories like My Grandma has Black Hair, Nancy No-size and The Colour of Home, in trying to widen the portrayal of families in picture books. But I wanted to tackle the big idea that "families come in all shapes and sizes" in one book. And I wanted to do it with Ros Asquith.
340Bright clouds descend, and angels watch thee round,
BAD STUFF: Nothing. Some people might claim it’s not realistic, but they’re missing the whole point of watching an entertaining movie. This isn’t a documentary, it’s an action-comedy flick based on an action-comedy TV show! Did anyone really think the TV show was ever realistic??!
- I am worthless unless I am perfect
Each time the Lord blesses us with a little one I try to surprise my man, and our parents with a special and unique way of telling them. Here is how I told of the 1st Baby, 2nd Baby, and 3rd Baby... and the 4th baby....
All the same, I'm still so very, very embarrassed...
You don’t always get what you want.
Just as we were getting used to our daily inundation of smoke from the Dismal Swamp fire, we go and have an earthquake, in Virginia of all places. Minor by Left Coast standards, but shocking to us nonetheless. But we had no time to dwell on fractures in the earth's crust, for we had an impending hurricane to deal with. As my friend Amy suggested, August was our month for Earth, Wind and Fire. Of the three, the wind portion of that trio had me the most concerned. Early on in its extensive coverage, Irene was predicted to be a "life changing event" and one that could "reshape the coastline". As a survivor of Hurricane Hugo, a life changing event for me, I pay attention when phrases like this are used.
- the thought of doing the accounts or dealing with the finances, makes us want to run away;
Will be ashes in that hour:
2.) Health
It was a lot of fun!! My good friend (and key clubber of the month!) Christina, put this whole thing together for us, :) she did an awesome job!!!!! We had a booklet of a whole bunch of different songs, most of the time, we did really well as far as singing goes, but... occasionally we'd totally butcher a song because not everyone knew the tune very well hahaha! And to make things even more awesome, we got Elf hats and Santa hats left over from the school's Holiday Spectacular (Thanks to Beth)!!
two can defend themselves.
3/10- Wish that I hadn’t even bothered
But if: when the bible says but and then if we are going a totally different direction. We say in our hearts the master is delaying his return. Just a side note the return of the Lord is imminent 1 day with the Lord is as 1000 years the end of Revelation 1:3 says the return of the Lord is near. In the Greek that is imminent in eternity with no time and space it is just as near now as it was when that was written.
is always gonna be for the good
The portion of the movie where you really got to see JoBeth scream in fright, thus showing her talent as a horror goddess, was during the climax—starting with the calm before the storm. Carol Anne was rescued, the family decided they were going to pack up and move despite the fact the house was supposedly “cleaned”.
As the kids lined up to head back inside, one of the garden educators led a sing-along about pollinating bees. The kids left the garden holding ground cherry seed husks and herbs picked up from a spiral garden by the entryway. Perhaps a few earthworms might have been smuggled out as well!
2.There is no rule 2.
National Council of Kurdish is ready to enter into a dialogue with us at this stage, and will not be dialogue only after their next convention, and it will be after two or three weeks.
But let's think this metaphor through.
to be covered by the dust
But why? Is there a gap in communication, a communication breakdown? Is it because the language of the arts is something not everyone has learned to understand? Perhaps it doesn’t connect to them because they often don’t relate to it themselves. If the public haven’t learned to speak it themselves, if they haven’t learned to engage creatively, with art in their everyday lives, we may (predictably) find that the public doesn’t always have the best grasp of art when it is ‘spoken’ to them.
Happy Tuesday Blog Friends!! Hope your having a GREAT week!!! :) I have a HUGE post for you! if you make it to the end THANK YOU! :)
This is my only picture of us there, please ignore how awful it is of me... I must have been sleepy from our midnight pizza dinner the night before.
The steady patter of pouring rain on our bedroom window’s metal awning at 6:00am made getting out of bed hard. A headache–not agonizing, but just enough to notice–made it a little harder.
The best way to begin adding more value to ur work is by valuing urself as a person. Acquire skills no one else has. Read books no one else is reading. Do what no one else is doing. Others have already taken, so stopping worring abt wat they r thinking or talking. Think thoughts no one else is thinking.
Sentret is Johto’s early starting Normal (rodent-based) Pokemon, much like Rattata, Zigzagoon, Bidoof and Patrat. The wallpaper was slightly challenging to balance because Sentret is so vertical (standing on its tail and all). Sentret kind of looks like a cross between Azumaril and Ursaring, haha.
The offending Tweet has now gone, as has the reference to GT Stewart.
I simply don’t want discussion to fall victim to statements, which does put the onus on folks.
I crocheted the flowers for the headband myself ^^ The internet told me how to make them. Awesome! The deer is a pin made out of felt. I really hope she likes it. She wrote in the description that she likes deer but it could be too cute for her taste :/
actions against Dunnes Stores, claiming that the Irish retail giant is producing ‘knock-off’ copies of their designer garments. Both UK chains are owned by British retailer Mosaic Fashions, also known for its Oasis, Warehouse, Principles, Nine West and Bertie brands. Damages of many millions of euro are sought.
Tickling at the back of my neck
And also (He will give you) another (blessing) which you love,-help from Allah (against your enemies) and a near victory. And give glad tidings (O Muhammad A, v zua p ) to the believers. (V.61: 13).
Suck down poison
The Camel Bookmobile ~ by Masha Hamilton (Kenya)
"Thanks."
Finally the woman stands up and, with a fierce look, lifting her arms toward the night planet, she thus exclaims:
I'm doing it because I need to!! I am moving on June 1, and desperately need to get as much packing done, and as much of my stuff into storage, as I possibly can while Big M is gone for training so all we'll have to do is move my furniture into storage when he gets back. (Hi - that was the longest sentence, ever. Count the commas.)
In either case, a “planning proposal” is prepared that justifies the proposed LEP. That proposal is considered by the Minister. This step is referred to as the “gateway determination” (section 56 of the Act). The Minister determines, at this stage, whether the draft LEP should proceed and on what conditions.
7. Other features
I haven't blogged in a long long time. I've been busy writing. Here's the cover for my next book. The amazing art was done by John Hendrix. I truly love this cover. That's the Jersey Devil on the sign up there pouring pancake syrup. Check out all those lovely details.
With Lola, make it three for three.
Thank you Father! The Lord says there is someone here tonight, he ask me to tell you; stop being afraid, because the destroyer will not visit your family again.
Ultimate DB2 data sharing availability, then, is delivered by a multi-box Parallel Sysplex. Now, suppose your organization runs DB2 for z/OS on one System z server, and suppose that single-box situation is unlikely to change anytime soon. Could your company still realize value from the implementation of a DB2 data sharing group, even if that group were to run on a one-box Parallel Sysplex? YES. Here's why: even on a one-box Sysplex, DB2 data sharing can deliver a very important availability benefit: the ability to apply DB2 maintenance, and even to migrate to a new release of DB2 (as I pointed out in a previous post to this blog), without the need for a maintenance window (you apply fixes to the load library of a member of the DB2 data sharing group, quiesce application traffic to that member, stop and start the member to activate the maintenance, resume the flow of application requests to the member, then do the same for the other member -- or members -- of the group). To put it another way: even when the Parallel Sysplex infrastructure (at least two z/OS LPARs, and at least two internal coupling facilities) is configured on one mainframe, implementation of a DB2 data sharing group will enable you to apply DB2 maintenance (and to perform DB2 version upgrades) without having to stop the application workload. At a time when unplanned DB2 outages are more and more rare (thanks to ever-more-reliable hardware and software), the opportunity to virtually eliminate planned outages can be a very big deal for an organization.
Lunch at CiCi”s Pizza: 1:00 (Please Bring $7.00 or a sack lunch)
Private shopping sites for moms, kids and babies (fashion sale sites, private sale clubs, sample sale sites) offer designer clothing at a 50-90% discount.
I laid out in bed and shut my eyes… i hugged my pillow and imagined it was Michael i was wrapping my arms around.. and i fell asleep. Finally. Sleep.
So far this plan has worked well for the past 3 months. We have tried other allowance plans tied to chores and it just doesn't work in our family. I just set up interest bearing savings account for each of the boys. My original plan was to just transfer the money into their account each month. Now, I think it is better if we make time to go to the bank each month and have them deposit the money themselves. I want them to get used to the idea of walking into a bank and handing over their hard earned cash. OK, so in this case it is not quite so hard earned, but you get what I mean. :)
It is at this point the guided tour finishes and you are left to wander the remaining exhibits in your own time – and you really can take just as long as you like over this (the tour is advertised as taking three hours but we were there for four and could easily have been in there for longer), reminded by the tour guide that there are
In the 1950’s classic, The Seven Year Itch, Marilyn Monroe’s character is a big fan of champagne and potato chips. It’s a charming combination when proposed by a breathy Marilyn (“It’s just a wonderful party!”). But there are other bubbly pairings that fare better. Champagne and chocolate, for example.
As people spent more for housing and services, the demand for cheaper goods grew. There were other factors in play too. The government pushed for a more ‘global economy’. Unions struck for more money for their members for them to be able to afford the increasingly costly housing, goods and services. The EPA pushed tougher regulations onto American manufacturing. The increase in cheap labor from illegal aliens put Americans out of work. Manufacturing concerns became more global corporation operated rather than single proprietor ownership. Corporations took a hard look at their bottom line and with the blessing of the government who took the country to free trade instead of fair trade, decided to take their manufacturing overseas for the cheaper labor to increase their bottom lines and satisfy their shareholders.
Unlucky stars are merely splinters
Chidziva
Lesson Learned: Answer these: What is your (weight loss) goal? How will you get there?
Think outside the box. Find uses for an object beyond what it was intended for. A magnetic strip meant to hold knives and other kitchen utensils became a storage rack for trinkets and art in Jackson’s room. It was such a hit with him that Sloan requested one, too.
A fresh new season means a fresh start, and we’re creating some new offers at Le Mistral as the weather turns warmer. Or not, as the case seems to be. So we thought we’d update you on our delicious offers…
I added some pieces of a broken mirror.
of stories untold
On the whole – 8/10
Because I have seen pretty bad comments to others who were posting bikini pictures I just want the people to read this before they judge over me ^^
The Girl with Glass Feet by Ali Shaw (Picador)
Ok, let me hear it…WE ARE TOP OF THE LEAGUE, I SAY WE ARE TOP OF THE LEAGUE!!!!!!!
Me: Nevermind…
heck, want a positive note? It may be possible to overcome this sickness, enflamed deliberately by Roger Ailes and his crew. Stanford Prof. James Fishkin and his colleagues ran an experiment in which a full spectrum of Californians were brought together and asked to soberly deliberate on state problems, negotiating a range of solutions. With their minds focused by sober responsibility, rabid partisans suddenly displayed flexibility, curiosity, willingness to learn and ... (yes even the Republicans)... a readiness to negotiate with their opposing neighbors, without calling them satanic.
North Coast Brewing Co. Scrimshaw Pilsner
The RIDA request represents a continuation of an extremely well-received and beneficial program that permits Roosevelt Island disabled citizens to go on trips that significantly improve their quality of life. Without this program, such travel is extremely difficult. The past success of the program, in the view of the committee, justifies continued funding. The recommendation is for the same amount as last year.
Each of these factors has differing levels of applicability to different kinds of books, but I don’t think there is any kind of book for which the publisher would think ‘Right, let’s just lay out a normal schedule that starts today, and the pub date is the month that schedule ends in’.
Your membership was revoked by the Party’s board of directors in 2010. That membership ban is still in place so we cannot accept your recent membership application”
well as Monday looms on a very beautiful clear and a very stary in their clory night..have a good week and sassy hugs one size fits all and many thanks for the wonderful comments it warms me old heart so much you really dont know just how much
Glue Dots! Did you know you can make your own? I didn't until I saw someones video, I don't remember where I saw it. I used the "Best Glue Ever" yes thats the name. I have a link to it on my favorite products page or my Amazon store at the top of the Blog.
Speed resubmitted her book, and a publishing company is considering it.
Take trips get high, Laugh joke and good bye
Combine brown sugar and cinnamon in small bowl. Brush surface of dough with 2 Tbsp. of melted butter. Sprinkle with brown sugar mixture. Beginning with long side of dough, roll up jellyroll style. Pinch seam to seal. With sharp knife, cut roll into twelve 1- inch slices. Place rolls, cut side up, into a greased 11x17 inch baking pan. Cover and let rise until nearly doubled, 30 to 45 minutes.
Back to base labor undertaker.
I have a lot of anger and sadness surrounding this. I suppose it all comes from some sort of sadness, if I take the time to pick apart the anger.
Hats: 16
He said 40 Iraqis were living in Nigeria, while 50 Nigerians, operating mostly in the oil sector, resided in Iraq.
Paper-White, Springtime Vintage DP
Fleurings have been ALL over the press. Not only have they hit the Headlines in Hawaii, The Daily Grommet, Esquire, US Weekly and many more, just this summer they've been featured in magazines in Japan! Visit the press room to see more, but believe me, these are all over the place!
Nov 07 Liverpool Academy Liverpool, UK
Hulk fails for me big time. The action is not fun. The drama was not compelling. It made me feel traumatized myself. I still have a difficult time with the existential ending. Not of that belongs in a summer super hero movie.
cut a piece of parchement a little bigger than the bottom of your pan. place the parchment over the bottom of the pan.
It's time for a brand new challenge at
11:26 AM on Sat., May. 12, 2012
But the more I thought on it, the more I liked the idea. ONE word, that I could cling to each day. ONE word, from God, that could encompass exactly what it is HE wants me to change.
When I sing friends, the Lord (I think I’ve chatted about this, but I’ll say it again) has convicted me to think about what I sing. I am not always good about this, but I am working on it. This verse gets taken out of context so much…yet I did, as my Noah would say, “rabbit trail”, just this verse and found great benefit.
Persecuted heroine who just doesn't fit in. Check.
The Mexican anthropologist eventually met with a Mayan astrologist, a descendant of the ancient Mayans. The astrologer explained that the Mayan calendar does not completely end. It is a cyclical calendar that just starts up over again. It is an astrological calendar not an astronomical calendar. It doesn’t predict the end of the world. This finally brought some peace-of-mind to the anthropologist.
Brad Pitt, Burn After Reading
What the introduction of the iPad did do was to drag publishers into the world of e-book jousting between Amazon's Kindle and every other e-reader device. It's just that the Apple iPad is the first real contender to the Kindle throne, as a device and utilising the more flexible epub format.
I drift through the corridors
I have decided that I can't put stress on myself to create so that I can blog as I think that is creating the problem with the lack of mojo.
In the mid 19th century, seven young men formed the Pre-Raphaelite Brotherhood in England as a reaction against what they saw as the stylistic pretense and industrial grime and vulgarity of the day. They were the rock stars of mid-Victorian England, with their sexual scandals, their women, drugs and a serious hair fetish.
Maureen Stearns--an author, parent, and educator living in St. Petersburg, Florida--has been teaching struggling learners for over 20 years. She holds both Exceptional Student Education and Community Psychology Degrees. She recently wrote Multiply and Divide with Sticks and Steps®: Teach this Easy Method in Just 5 Minutes, to help students conquer this stumbling block.
As a preemption, to counter the planned American blitzkrieg into Central Asia and Pakistan from Afghanistan, Indian Army Chief General VK Singh warned yesterday that thousands of Chinese military forces have now moved into Pakistan-occupied-Kashmir joining an estimated 11,000 more of them believed to have entered that region in the past year.
Being a part of a high performing Team can be a challenge as it calls for commitment, good communication skills and cooperation between members. By practicing these essential tips, you too can be an effective team member.
At the end, the members handed out presents to everyone who went. The present that the fans got seems to be a photo of some sort~ 2NE1 handed them out personally by hand. SE7EN was a surprise guest at “2NE1′s Party” event.
So I sat and waited.
So thanks to my rediscovered love for all things tribal/Vegas-adjacent, I've dedicated this week to building a deeper connection to my inner Sasquatch. Yesterday it started with watching "The Hangover", which is where I was reminded how much I love the song "Iko Iko". That video wasn't totally non-sequitur. But did you see the awesome wardrobe up in that piece? Ugh... If only I would have been older in the 80's. I TOTALLY would have rocked that look/learned those crazy dance moves. Some people have all the luck...
Kosher food has a reputation for being bad, but it simply depends on HOW the caterer works and what you serve. Certain cuts of beef just simply aren't as good, because they are imitations of the "real" cut, and a good caterer will steer you clear of those and make recommendations that are really quite delicious. Additionally, nothing on the wedding can START until after sundown, so keep that in mind as you are planning. So often BAD kosher catering is prepared on a Friday afternoon and re-heated after sundown on Saturday. Thus the reputation for overcooked items. One of the things you should ask is WHEN they cook most of their food. Prep is fine the day prior, but cooking should happen that evening.
Jen wrote:
Hope you have a good week.
* Teaching Spirituality
- Lately I have enjoyed "unsubscribing" to many of the emails I get, most of them spam. Its so easy to just click"unsubscribe" and get rid of unwanted email.
From left starting with the blue OPI bottle:
The problems in many communities of some are deeply rooted and, like all weeds, are hard to extirpate.
'That's the winning entries for the Competition,' remarked the librarian handing me my change.
This picture was taken on Monday, while I was out at the festival grounds. This is also my current Wallpaper on my computer. It has been a while since I’ve take pictures of Morning Glories. Mainly b/c I’m never w/ a camera when I’m around them.
Reliance Industries Limited (RIL) outlined its financial statement for the year ending 31 March 2012. Reliance Industries recorded a revenue of Rs. 339,792 Crore ($ 66.8 BILLION) for the FY 2011-12. Besides, their consolidated revenue accounts to Rs.19, 724 Crore ($ 3.9 BILLION) for the same period. This year witnessed their highest ever exports of Rs. 208,042 Crore ($ 40.9 BILLION) that forms 14% of India’s exports.
STR: 4d6+12 (26)
At this Christmas season, what better thing should we do than to praise Him Who came for us?
Once again, the impressionable and the naive have taken a one-off and projected it as a "thing that will change everything."
If a tornado were to approach now my mouth would become dry and my eyes would be agog. 'Check out the stovepipe on that!' I would run toward the tornado, declaring my adoration. I would be swept up by the tornado. The tornado would turn me around and around. Rapidly. Over and over. My heart aflutter. I would rise up high through the tumult and be delivered into a calm spin cycle, gently revolving amongst the clouds. The noise and chaos beneath me. Trailers, discarded bikes, road signs, abandoned pets and livestock passing by me. Transcended. Ascended. Heavenly. I am hers. I am hers until she tires of carrying me and drops me back to earth. Hard. And my limbs will break and my neck will break and my back will break and my heart will break and I will probably die. But, it will have been worth it. What a ride!
If you are saying – Matthew how do I TRULY do this – Here is how:
The MetCon was 5 rounds of 5 Power Cleans (155/95lbs) and 10 burpees. I didn’t RX at the 95lb weight but I did do 85lbs. I felt really good too. I struggled but I powered through. I feel like I have Power Cleans down really well technique wise so that helps. I’m not clouding my brain with other thoughts. It helps a ton! I managed to do 4 of the 5 rounds unbroken. And burpees after each set well they sucked!!!! I finished in 7:33. Overall I was pleased only cause the weight was HEAVY!!
I've learned, sometimes, the answer is no. And sometimes God says no because He has something different planned. And He had something amazing planned, alright. My dad had two surgeries to take out all of the cancer- and the cancer has not returned since then. God said no to the treatment because He had something SO MUCH better planned.
Marc Almond Tears run rings UK
That's a place beyond endurance, beyond strength, and beyond all that you think you can be.
I have been so lazy!
1206 **D-IV/3/1995. “John Van Doren, Editor, Poet, and Patron of the Arts.” Introduction, Law and Literature Lecture Series, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1999(16), pp. 396-99.)
In addition, although Rakofsky might not realize he is ineligible to practice law, it still could be prove to an ethical issue if he is unknowingly engaged in unauthorized practice. That would actually be a big problem, as New Jersey has disciplined lawyers in the past for practicing while ineligible. ”I didn’t get the paperwork” will be a difficult defense because of the bona fide office rule, and my guess is the state bar would say an attorney has an obligation to update their address with them.
Fifteen minutes later it was all over. We landed safely at Nadi Airport.
2012 is the year of the Superhero. With the Avengers due out this Friday and Batman and Spider-Man being released a couple of months later, 2012 contains probably the three most highly anticipated superhero films of this young decade. It seems like today the cinema belongs to the men in tights but it wasn’t long ago that superhero films were a rarity. The genre has been sort of revolutionized over the recent years and has become one of Hollywood’s biggest commodities. So before we all pay our 7 dollars to see the Bat, some Avengers, and a Spider, it is time to look back at the films that help pave the way for a genre that has become as “super” as the characters that inhabit it.
I don’t automatically discount a book or movie because it’s popular. I remember working a bookstore in the 80′s and there were just as many people who would line up and demand the latest Lawrence Sanders as there were the Danielle Steele. If you want a look into the most sordid parts of human nature, Sanders did a fabulous job.
The Goosebumps books were mostly a nostalgia buy for me, but also because of the pulp children’s’ horror factor. It’s all about weird and gross shit, stuff that kids think are scary but adults think are lame. But the thing is, in their brevity, there’s no room to waste on messing about with conventions, poetic language, narration. The narrator is the same as the kid reading it. They build up the atmosphere, shit happens, the end. Nothing fancy, cut to the fucking chase, keep it nice and compact. That’s more or less how I like to work. If I want to do something, I do it, no messing about. Maybe a little messing about. But mainly, I just want to tell an entertaining story. That’s what I’m hoping to get out of R.L. Stine’s “The Blob That Ate Everyone” and the collection of ten short stories, “More Tales to Give You Goosebumps”.
“The development of Hudson Yards is going to take place over a series of economic cycles,” Lieber said, noting that it would take “decades to complete” 24 million square feet.
2. "Black women are so much cooler with sex than white women." (If you think implying black women are looser than white women is gonna get you some, you're wrong.)
Speaking of a deal…It’s a deal gone wrong. BC Jeans people, as part of the “terms” that Beyonce had come to with Jean were to allow Jean and Knowles to do a duet together IF Jean were to get her own record deal. That has not happened yet for Jean, so that makes Beyonce still having not truly paid for her lies. Was Jean compensated for her work? Will Beyonce come to steal from the unsuspecting artist again?
A simple friendship, it would be forever
all our good deeds are like polluted rags;
Dark Hour: Serpent Moon Trilogy Book 1 / Ginger Garrett
Caffeine, cake and kiddies gone crazy...bring it on.
Oh precious is the flow that makes me white as snow.
Previous spooky doings based around this art-rock oddity include: perfectly workable DJ decks going dead on the spot and flickery electrical faults and blow outs(captured on this podcast) - We've now become so superstitious about the tune and it's voodoo routines that we ran a should we/shouldn't we poll on Facebook. Of course the votes were all in favour of 'play not pass' - so, it got plonked on the playlist.
Still Cries Before Dawn by The Out Key Hole
Supposing they do kick me out .Am I to feel scared?
Soldiers from all over ...
When I was a teenager, my life was defined by music and words. And these two forces culminated in a special sort of ecstasy every time I bought a new record album.
An Art Deco look
Even if this was late, I want to say Happy Labor Day in the Philippines!
The Lord Jesus Christ is the only Saviour and if anything is added to that work of grace at the cross it nullifies the value of His blood.
Scott.
I'd been invited by Chitra Mangma, the mastermind behind indie Melbourne label "Chitra's Closet" which is described online as "ultra feminine" "colourful" and "vintage", which all sound jolly to me.
My Stuff - Blackened green/gold sparkle (applied to outer V with MAC 217 by patting and sweeping outward)
“BK Fat Boy”
Sure, the government will investigate the problems surrounding this controlled burn turned wildfire, but can we guarantee change? I’m not sure we can without threatening those deep pockets. Is this bill a solution to the problem of limited government liability?
Roger is on shaky ground when he accuses others of practices reminiscent of totalitarianism. It was his Speakwrite machine which set the record straight, after all, so now everyone knows that London brewery Barclay Perkins never existed.
Supersoldier. Weapons.
Live reading of For the Love of Peanut Butter by Author/Illustrator Desire Grover
Barry Schwartz – Our Loss of Wisdom
I had lunch at Cozmo cafe in Zaitunay Bay!
At a macro level, Egypt’s economy dwarfs all the other economies (see Figure bellow). GNI per head ranges widely, from only US$100 in Ethiopia to more than fourteen times that amount –US$1,490 – in Egypt. In addition, the proportion of the amount that accrues to agriculture in Ethiopia is substantially more than in Egypt.
All this goes some way to skirt around the subject of this piece, which is a response to the question, “What should our schools look like?” By this, I do not mean the aesthetic qualities of educational establishments, about which I have written before4. Rather, I want to consider what the dominant landscape of schooling in the UK should be, with regard to their size and nature. If the sacred cow through the second half of the twentieth century was the equality between students and teachers—characterised by the teachings of A.S. Neill, who wrote,
“And you’re going to apologize to Kid Win. I don’t ever want you assaulting him again.”
thousands of feathers, hundreds of trilling birds
By the way - BNP apologists who link to BNP blogs are not our ‘comrades’.
For poolish: 5-7 hours (or the night before) baking, place 1/2 cup of warm water, 1/2 cups of flour, and 1/2 teaspoons of yeast into a plastic container, mix and cover lightly. Leave in a warm place until bubbles are seen and a slightly fermented aroma rises.
“I think I’m probably meant to be an academic,” Johnston was quoted as saying. And she has been, getting a master’s in one institution, going to seminary at another, doing field research in India in her area of interest — Indian Catholicism — and currently working toward a Ph.D in religious studies at the University of Iowa.
2007: Kevin Youkilis (DNP)
Cumin/jeera powder - 1/2 teaspoon
You can see the brown to the right....
Publisher: Realms (February 7, 2012)
As a child I always enjoyed "The Cat in the Hat Comes Back" in which Dr Seuss's cat draws upon assistance from increasingly smaller - yet more powerful - cats, named sequentially for letters of the alphabet, who emerge from his hat.
Marley looked into Piper’s eyes, not understanding the question. Why wouldn’t I have done it?
"What do you think it stops?" he asked me.
Le President Trois: Dwight Eisenhower
And that is how I want to introduce myself, Onyango Oloo, as an expert with a valid opinion on who was behind the bombing at Uhuru Park. Everyone knows that you do not have to go to Kiganjo Police College, Scotland Yard or wherever those FBI guys earn their right to flash their IDs to know who dunnit, ama?
Research in naturopathy tends to focus on single treatments used by naturopaths, rather than naturopathy as a whole. In 1998, an extensive review of such single-treatment studies found that naturopathic healing methods were effective for 15 different medical conditions, including osteoarthritis, asthma, and middle ear infections.
